Uses of different D-dimer levels can reduce the need for venous duplex scanning to rule out deep vein thrombosis in patients with symptomatic pulmonary embolism.This study investigated the prevalence and distribution of deep vein thrombosis (DVT) in patients with symptomatic pulmonary embolism (PE) to establish a screening protocol to reduce unnecessary venous duplex scanning using different D-dimer level rather than single cutoff point of 0.5 microg/mL in patients with low and moderate pretest clinical probability (PTP).The PTP score and D-dimer testing were used to evaluate 85 consecutive patients with symptomatically proven PE before venous duplex scanning. After calculating the PTP score, patients were divided into low (<or=0 points), moderate (1 to 2 points), and high (>or=3 points) PTP groups. The receiver operating characteristic (ROC) curves analysis was used to determine the appropriate D-dimer cutoff point in low and moderate PTP, with a negative predictive value of >98%.The study enrolled 81 patients. The prevalence of DVT was 63%, with 27 patients (33%) classified as low, 38 (47%) as moderate, and 16 (20%) as high PTP. DVT was detected in nine patients (33%) in the low PTP group, in 27 (71%) in the moderate group, and in 15 (94%) in the high group. In the low PTP patients, the difference in the value of D-dimer assay between positive-scan and negative-scan patients was statistically significant (9.99 +/- 7.33 vs 3.46 +/- 4.20, respectively; P = .008). Conversely, no significant difference in the D-dimer assay value between positive and negative scan results was found in the moderate PTP patients. ROC curves analysis were used to select D-dimer cutoff points of 2.0 microg/mL for the low PTP group and 0.7 microg/mL for the moderate PTP groups. For both groups, D-dimer testing provided 100% sensitivity and 100% negative predictive value in the diagnosis of DVT. In the low PTP group, specificity increased from 33% to 67% (P = .046). In the moderate PTP group, however, the determined D-dimer level did not improve the specificity. Overall, venous duplex scanning could have been reduced by 17% (14/81) by using different D-dimer cutoff points.A combination of specific D-dimer level and clinical probability score is most effective in the low PTP patients in excluding DVT. In the moderate PTP group, however, the recommended cutoff point of 0.5 microg/mL may be preferable. These results show that a different D-dimer level is more useful than single cutoff point of 0.5 microg/mL in excluding DVT in established PE patients.[Prognostic value of D-dimers in venous thromboembolic pathology].Diagnostic strategy using a modified clinical decision rule and D-dimer test to rule out pulmonary embolism in elderly in- and outpatients.Excluding or confirming pulmonary embolism remains a diagnostic challenge. In elderly patients pulmonary embolism is associated with substantial co-morbidity and mortality, and many elderly patients with suspected pulmonary embolism are inpatients. The safety and efficacy of the combination of a clinical probability (CDR) and d-dimer test in excluding pulmonary embolism in this group is unclear. We retrospectively analysed data of two prospective studies of consecutive in-and outpatients with suspected pulmonary embolism. The patients were categorized into three age groups: <65 years, 65-75 years and >75 years. The sensitivity, negative predictive value and the proportion of patients with the combination of a non-high CDR score according to Wells (< or = 4) and a normal d-dimer result were calculated for each group. In 747 consecutive patients with suspected pulmonary embolism, sensitivity and negative predictive value of a non-high CDR and a normal d-dimer result in outpatients (n=538) of all age categories (<65 years, 65-75 years and >75 years) were both 100%. These tests were, however, less reliable for inpatients(n=209), irrespective of their age (sensitivity 91% [ CI: 79-98%], negative predictive value 88 % [CI: 74-96%]. The proportion of both in-and outpatients >75 years with a non-high CDR and a normal d-dimer concentration was only 14%, whereas this was 22% in patients 65-75 years and 41% among in-and outpatients <65 years, respectively. In elderly outpatients the combination of a non-high CDR and a normal d-dimer result is a safe strategy to rule out pulmonary embolism. However, in inpatients this algorithm is not reliable to safely exclude pulmonary embolism. In addition, the proportion of patients >65 years in which this strategy excludes pulmonary embolism is markedly lower compared to younger patients.Simple and safe exclusion of pulmonary embolism in outpatients using quantitative D-dimer and Wells' simplified decision rule.A safe and effective management strategy is pivotal in excluding pulmonary embolism (PE). The combination of Wells' simplified dichotomous clinical decision rule and D-dimer test is non-invasive and could be highly efficient, though its safety has not been widely studied. We evaluated safety and efficiency of this combination in excluding PE. Wells clinical decision rule was performed in 941 consecutive patients with suspected PE and, if patients had a score <or=4.0 points, a VIDAS D-dimer test followed. Patients with a normal D-dimer concentration had no further tests, PE was considered excluded, and patients did not receive anticoagulant treatment. Patients, in whom PE was excluded, were followed up for three months. Four hundred fifty patients (51.2%) had a clinical decision score =4.0 points and a normal D-dimer concentration. In 45 of these patients, during the initial diagnostic period additional objective testing, although not indicated, was performed, and PE was established in two patients. During three months of follow up no venous thromboembolic events (VTE) occurred. Therefore, the overall VTE failure rate was two of 450 (0.4% [95%CI 0-1.1]); the overall prevalence of PE was 12.3%. The diagnostic protocol could be completed and allowed a decision to be made in 90% of the study patients. This study has prospectively established the safety of a combination of a dichotomized clinical decision rule and D-dimer test in ruling out PE. The strategy proved highly efficient, since more than 50% of patients could be managed without the need for more invasive and expensive tests.The performance of STA-Liatest D-dimer assay in out-patients with suspected pulmonary embolism.Several studies have shown that D-dimer can reliably rule out pulmonary embolism (PE) in out-patients. However, various assays have different sensitivities and specificities to detect thrombosis. Our aim was to evaluate the performance of STA-Liatest D-Di in out-patients referred for suspected PE in a prospective outcome study. 495 consecutive patients referred to Østfold Hospital Trust-Fredrikstad, Norway for suspected PE between February 2002 and December 2003, were recruited in a study evaluating a decision-based algorithm combining clinical probability (CP), D-dimer, and multi-slice computer tomography (MSCT). D-dimer was performed as a first step test. No further testing was carried out in patients with D-dimer < or =0.4 mg/l and low/intermediate CP. The remaining patients proceeded to MSCT. All patients were followed up for 3 months to assess the 3-month thromboembolic risk. The final cohort consisted of 432 patients. PE was diagnosed in 102 (23%) patients. At a D-dimer cut-off point of 0.4 mg/l the tests had the highest sensitivity (100%) and specificity (36%). It safely ruled out PE in 120 (28%) patients. Kappa-coefficients for comparisons versus VIDAS and Asserachrom showed good concordance. STA-Liatest is a reliable and effective assay that can safely rule out PE in out-patients with a performance comparable with that of enzyme-linked immunosorbent assay-based d-dimer levels.Diagnostic value of D-dimer in patients with suspected pulmonary embolism: results from a multicentre outcome study.D-dimer tests are used in various diagnostic strategies to exclude pulmonary embolism (PE). However, their role as an exclusionary first-line test is still uncertain, mainly because accuracy of the test varies according to the assay and the studied population.The aim of this multicentre study was to evaluate the accuracy of D-dimer testing in patients with suspected PE. Diagnosis of PE was based on pre-test clinical probability (PCP) evaluation and both single-detector spiral CT (CT) and lower limbs compression ultrasonography (CUS). Lung scanning and/or pulmonary angiography was mandatory when CT or CUS was inconclusive and when both CT and CUS were normal in a patient with a high PCP. All patients were followed-up for 3 months, looking for VTE recurrence. D-dimers were collected within 24 h of inclusion and stored in each local hematology unit, to be analyzed at the end of all inclusions; physicians in charge of the patient were blinded to D-dimer results.Three hundred and fifty two patients were included in 4 centres. Prevalence of PE was 38.6%. PCP was low in 82 (23.3%), intermediate in 176 (50%) and high in 94 (26.7%) patients. Sensitivity of D-dimer was 96.3% (95% CI: 93-99) and negative predictive value reached 94.4% (95% CI: 90-99). Five patients with a confirmed PE had a D-dimer level below 500 ng/ml (two patients with a high PCP). Among 258 patients with low or intermediate PCP, 80 (31%) had a negative D-dimer test result; three of them had a false negative result and the number needed to test was 3.3. Among 94 patients with a high PCP, 9 had a negative D-dimer test result; two of them had a false negative result and the number needed to test was 13.5.These results confirm that rapid assays used in this study can safely exclude PE in first-line testing only in non-high CP patients.Comparison of high specificity with standard versions of a quantitative latex D-dimer test in the assessment of community pulmonary embolism: HaemosIL D-dimer HS and pulmonary embolism.D-dimer assays are sensitive but have poor specificity. False positive results lead to extra imaging and hospital admissions.To make a pilot comparison of the diagnostic accuracy of the standard quantitative latex HemosIL D-dimer assay with a newer HemosIL D-dimer HS version designed to have improved specificity. PATIENTS / METHODS: Consecutive patients presenting from the community to an Emergency Department that were investigated for suspected pulmonary embolism using a D-dimer test were included in the study. Standard and D-dimer HS tests were performed. Pulmonary Embolism was diagnosed on the basis of imaging studies or post-mortem at any time from presentation to 90 days thereafter.The prevalence of Pulmonary Embolism was 4.5% (18/402). The sensitivity, specificity, negative predictive value, and positive predictive value for the standard quantitative D-dimer test was 100% (81.5 - 100.0), 49.2% (44.1 - 54.3),100% (98.1 - 100.0), and 8.5% (5.1 - 13.0), respectively, and 100% (81.5 - 100.0), 58.3% (53.2 - 63.3),100% (98.4 - 100.0), and 10.1% (6.1 - 15.5), for the D-dimer HS test. There were 35 (16%) fewer 'false positives' using the D-dimer HS assay compared with the standard assay.D-dimer HS has superior specificity to the standard quantitative D-dimer test without any loss of sensitivity. The generation of fewer false positive results should lead to less unnecessary diagnostic imaging; the use of which is associated with increased hospital admissions and length of stay. The HS assay may therefore have significant health economic benefits.Quantitative d-dimer levels and the extent of venous thromboembolism in CT angiography and lower limb ultrasonography.We evaluated the diagnostic yield of multidetector-row CT angiography and determined the clot burden within pulmonary vasculature as a measure of pulmonary embolism (PE) severity at different d-dimer levels and pretest clinical probabilities.254 consecutive patients referred to CT pulmonary angiography for suspected PE after d-dimer testing were grouped into clinical probability classes using Wells' score, and the frequency of PE was determined. A score representing clot burden within pulmonary vasculature was calculated from the number of obstructed segmental arteries in CT scans in a partly differing group of 96 PE positive patients.The prevalence of PE increases with the d-dimer level (7% at d-dimer levels of 0.5-1 microg/ml, reaching 90% at d-dimer levels > 9 microg/ml; p < 0.001). D-dimer levels above 4 microg/ml are associated with a significantly higher clot burden in pulmonary arteries (median score 11 versus 5, and 53% versus 16% of patients in the subgroup with a score > 10 points; p < 0.001), and thrombus in a main pulmonary artery was detected more frequently (37% versus 9%, p = 0.003). Similar results were obtained for distal versus proximal deep venous thromboses, detected by ultrasonography of the lower limb in a separate group of 44 patients.High d-dimer levels are associated with an increased prevalence of CT radiographic findings indicating extended clinically severe PE or lower limb venous thrombosis.[Utility of D-dimer assay for diagnosing pulmonary embolism: single institute study].Pulmonary embolism (PE) presents with diverse non-specific signs and symptoms and its diagnosis mainly depends on diagnostic imaging tests which are laborious and not cost-effective, and only a small proportion of patients with suspected PE actually have the disease. The aim of this study was to analyze the utility of D-dimer test for diagnosing PE by categorizing patients into 'PE likely' and 'PE unlikely' groups using Wells score for clinical probability.One hundred forty consecutive patients with clinically suspected PE, in whom D-dimer and imaging tests were performed were enrolled. Dignosis of PE was made when the imaging tests were positive. Wells scores were retrospectively assigned and the dignostic utility of D-dimer test was analyzed.Of the 140 patients studied, D-dimer test was positive in 97 and diagnostic imaging tests revealed PE, deep vein thrombosis (DVT), and PE+DVT in 24, 3, and 7 patients, respectively. For the diagnosis of PE, D-dimer test with cutoff value of > or =230 ng/mL showed sensitivity, specificity, and negative predictive value of 96.8%, 39.6%, and 97.7%, respectively. These values were 96.3%, 37.9%, and 91.7% in 'PE likely' group (n=56), and 100%, 38.8%, and 100% in 'PE unlikely' group (n=84). Among 43 patients with D-dimer values of <230 ng/mL, only one patient was diagnosed with PE, who belonged to the 'PE likely' group.D-dimer test cannot be used as a stand-alone test to diagnose PE, but it can be helpful for exclusion of PE especially in 'PE unlikely' group according to Wells score.Contribution of a new, rapid, individual and quantitative automated D-dimer ELISA to exclude pulmonary embolism.The performance of a new automated ELISA for a rapid, individual and quantitative measurement of plasma D-dimer (VIDAS D-dimer) has been evaluated. First, a study of 100 patients was performed in order to choose the best couple of antibodies in comparison with an already clinically validated ELISA. Then the results were certified in a prospective study including 195 consecutive patients suspected of pulmonary embolism (PE). For a cut-off level of 500 ng/ml VIDAS D-dimer showed a sensitivity of 100% (95% confidence interval 92-100), a specificity of 37.6%, a negative predictive value of 100% (95% CI 93.3-100) and a positive predictive value of 33.1%. During a 6 months' follow-up no patient (95% CI 0-6.4) with D-dimer < 500 ng/ml presented a new suspicion of venous thromboembolic disease. These results suggest that this rapid and single-dose ELISA provides a very useful tool for the clinician to exclude on a day-to-day basis the diagnosis of PE.Value of D-dimer testing for the exclusion of pulmonary embolism in patients with previous venous thromboembolism.D-dimer levels remain elevated in many patients after completion of a 6-month anticoagulant drug course for a first episode of venous thromboembolism (VTE), which may limit the clinical usefulness of D-dimer testing for ruling out a possible recurrence.We assessed the safety and usefulness of D-dimer testing in patients with suspected pulmonary embolism (PE) who had experienced a previous VTE. We analyzed data from 2 outcome studies that enrolled 1721 consecutive emergency department patients with clinically suspected PE. Information on the existence of a previous episode of VTE was abstracted from the database. All the patients underwent a sequential diagnostic workup, including an enzyme-linked immunosorbent assay D-dimer test and a 3-month follow-up.The proportion of confirmed PE was 24.1% (415/1719); PE was ruled out by a negative D-dimer test result in 32.7% (462/1411) of the patients without previous VTE but in only 15.9% (49/308) of the patients with previous VTE (P<.001). The 3-month thromboembolic risk was 0% (95% confidence interval, 0.0%-7.9%) in patients with previous VTE and a negative D-dimer test result. The 2-fold lower chance of a negative D-dimer test result in patients with previous VTE was independent of older age, active malignancy, fever, and recent surgery.In patients with suspected PE and previous VTE, a negative D-dimer test result seems to allow safely ruling out a recurrent event. However, the proportion of negative results is lower in such patients, definitely reducing the clinical usefulness of the D-dimer test in that subgroup.Performance of the AxSYM D-dimer assay for the exclusion of pulmonary embolism.Clinical usefulness of D-dimer depending on clinical probability and cutoff value in outpatients with suspected pulmonary embolism.We evaluated whether a highly sensitive D-dimer test is clinically useful and safe for ruling out pulmonary embolism (PE) in patients with a high clinical probability and whether adopting different cutoff values according to the clinical probability category might increase the proportion of patients in whom PE is ruled out.We retrospectively analyzed the databases of 2 outcome studies on the diagnosis of PE with a 3-month follow-up that included 1409 patients. We evaluated the usefulness of D-dimer testing by calculating the number needed to test to rule out one PE, and its safety by measuring the 3-month thromboembolic risk in patients not treated by anticoagulant agents based on a normal D-dimer level.The sensitivity of D-dimer was 100% in all clinical probability categories, but the number needed to test increased with increasing clinical probability of PE. The 95% confidence interval (0%-23%) of the 3-month thromboembolic risk (0%) among 13 of 121 patients with a normal D-dimer level and a high clinical probability of PE was wide. Increasing the cutoff value to 700 mug/L in patients with a low clinical probability would rule out PE in an additional 5% of the entire patient cohort at the expense of a lower sensitivity (93% [95% confidence interval, 83%-97%]).The safety of D-dimer testing in patients with a high clinical probability of PE is not established, and testing results are rarely negative in such patients. Increasing the enzyme-linked immunosorbent assay D-dimer cutoff value only marginally increased the test's usefulness.[Usefulness of fast ELISA determination of D-dimer levels for diagnosing pulmonary embolism in an emergency room].To determine the sensitivity and negative predictive value of D-dimer levels measured by fast enzyme-linked immunoabsorbent assay (ELISA) in pulmonary embolism.Prospective study of consecutive patients with suspicion of pulmonary embolism attended in the Emergency Room of the Hospital de La Princesa in Madrid, Spain. Thromboembolism was diagnosed with an algorithm established in the hospital, and D-dimer levels were determined by fast ELISA (VIDAS D-dimer Assay) in each patient suspected of pulmonary embolism. Patients with negative findings from a test not considered a reference method for thromboembolism were followed for 3 months.Of 132 patients with clinical suspicion, 28 (21.2%) were positive and 104 (78.7%) were negative for embolism. D-dimer levels were below 0.5 microg/mL in 31 patients, 30 of whom did not have pulmonary thromboembolism whereas 1 did. D-dimer levels were abowe 0..5 microg/mL in 101 patients; thromboembolism did not occur in 74 of these but was reported in the remaining 27. For a value of 1 microg/mL, 66 patients had values below the cut off, 3 of whom presented pulmonary embolism. The remaining 66 patients had D-dimer levels above or equal to 1 microg/mL; 25 of them had a positive diagnosis for embolism and 41 had a negative diagnosis. Sensitivity and negative predictive values were 96.4% (95% confidence interval [CI], 79.8%-99.9%) and 96.8% (95% CI, 81.5%-98.8%), respectively, at a cut off of 0.5 microg/mL; and 89.2% (95% CI, 70.6%-97.2%) and 95.45% (95% CI, 86.4%-98.8%), respectively, at a cut off of 1 microg/mL.In an emergency room, thromboembolism can be excluded if plasma levels of D-dimer measured by fast ELISA are below 0.5 microg/mL because of the high negative predictive value at this cut off.[Evaluation of a latex test for determining the fibrinogen/fibrin D-dimer (XDP)].In this study an agglutination assay, by a monoclonal antibody coated latex particles, has been used for measuring specifically D-dimer fibrinogen/fibrin concentrations in twenty patients with various thrombotic diseases; the authors have analyzed the test reliability and the possible interferences caused by conditions of specimens collection and preparation.[Value of plasma D-dimer assays in the diagnosis of venous thromboembolism].The diagnostic usefulness of measuring plasma D-dimers using the ELISA method and the latex agglutination test has been prospectively evaluated in 117 patients hospitalized for suspicion of acute venous thrombo-embolism (AVTE): pulmonary embolism was suspected in 80 patients and the remaining 37 had a suspicion of deep vein thrombosis of the lower limbs. The diagnosis of AVTE was confirmed in 50% of the patients, all of whom underwent gold standard invasive investigation i.e. pulmonary angiography and/or contrast venography. The sensitivity, specificity, negative predictive value and positive predictive value of a D-dimers plasma concentration exceeding 500 ng/ml for the diagnosis of AVTE were respectively 98, 58, 97 and 70% when using the ELISA method, and 86, 71, 84 and 75% when using the latex assay. In 47 patients whose lung scans yielded abnormalities of indeterminate probability of pulmonary embolism, the sensitivity of the ELISA method was very high (94%), but that of latex assay was low (67%). Our results demonstrate that measuring the plasma D-dimers by the latex assay should not be used in the diagnosis of AVTE. On the other hand, the ELISA method might be of great interest in the diagnostic strategy of AVTE, as a normal concentration of D-dimers rules out almost definitely the diagnosis of AVTE, and hence, spares from performing invasive investigations.The emergency department utility of Simplify D-dimer to exclude pulmonary embolism in patients with pleuritic chest pain.Pleuritic chest pain is a common presenting complaint in the emergency department (ED) and a symptom of pulmonary embolism. Patients with pleuritic chest pain would benefit from a simple and rapid way of screening for pulmonary embolism. The aim of this study is to assess the utility of Simplify D-dimer as a rule-out tool for pulmonary embolism in ED patients with pleuritic chest pain.This was a prospective diagnostic study in a large city-center ED. Four hundred twenty-five patients with pleuritic chest pain were prospectively recruited between February 2002 and June 2003. Simplify D-dimer testing was performed on each patient in the ED. All patients followed an independent reference standard diagnostic algorithm for pulmonary embolism. Each patient was followed up clinically for 3 months.The calculated sensitivity of Simplify D-dimer for pulmonary embolism was 81.8% (95% confidence interval [CI] 61.4% to 92.7%), and specificity was 74.2% (95% CI 69.6% to 78.4%). The negative predictive value was 98.6% (95% CI 96.6% to 99.6%), positive predictive value 15.0% (95% CI 9.1% to 22.7%), negative likelihood ratio 0.25 (95% CI 0.10 to 0.52) and positive likelihood ratio 3.17 (95% CI 2.30 to 3.97). The study cohort pretest probability was 5.3%. A negative Simplify result reduced the posttest probability to 1.3% (95% CI 0.5% to 3.4%).The Simplify D-dimer is not sufficiently sensitive to exclude the diagnosis of pulmonary embolism in all patients presenting to the ED with pleuritic chest pain.Prospective diagnostic accuracy assessment of the HemosIL HS D-dimer to exclude pulmonary embolism in emergency department patients.Chest pain and shortness of breath are among the most common symptoms requiring immediate evaluation. Testing for pulmonary embolism (PE) has become easier and widespread due to D-dimer blood tests. Safe use of these tests is only possible if sensitivity is high and they are used in non-high probability patients. We evaluated diagnostic performance of the HemosIL HS D-dimer, which despite FDA approval in 2005, has been minimally reported in prospective standard clinical care.We used a prospective observational study design to follow patients in a single center with the HemosIL HS ordered for symptoms of possible PE with positive test result if >243 ng/ml. The outcome was PE or deep venous thrombosis (DVT) at the time of presentation or subsequent 45 days determined by structured evaluation of imaging tests, phone, or medical record follow-up in all patients.529 patients received a D-dimer and 4.7% were ultimately diagnosed with PE or DVT. The sensitivity of the HemosIL HS was 96.0% (95% CI; 79.6 to 99.9%) specificity was 65.7% (95% CI; 61.4 to 69.8%) and likelihood ratio negative was 0.06 (95% CI; 0.01 to 0.42). The probability of PE in patients with a negative D-dimer was 1/332 or 0.3% (95% CI; 0.01% to 1.67%). The receiver operator curve had an area under the curve of 0.87 and supported the current cut-point as optimal.The HemosIL HS D-dimer had high sensitivity, very low negative post-test probability and is useful in excluding PE in the acute care setting.[Diagnosis of venous thrombosis and/or pulmonary embolism by determination of d-dimers using ELISA. Review based on a study of 80 consecutive patients hospitalized in an emergency unit].The sensitivity and specificity of an ELISA method (Fibrinostika Fbdp Organon Teknika) for assay of D-dimers in the diagnosis of deep vein thrombosis and/or pulmonary embolism was studied in 80 consecutive patients seen at an emergency unit. Fifty-six of the patients presented clinical signs of deep vein thrombosis. Diagnosis was confirmed in 26 of the 56 patients with a D-dimer level above 370 ng/ml (sensitivity 92.3%) and 370 ng/ml for 13 of 30 patients with a negative venous ultrasound Doppler examination (specificity 43.3%). The positive predictive value was 58.5% and the negative predictive value was 87%. There was a significant difference in the level of D-dimers between distal and proximal deep vein thrombosis. In 40 cases with suspected pulmonary embolis, either alone or with suspected deep vein thrombosis, diagnosis was made in only 4 of 9 with a highly or intermediately probable ventilation/perfusion scan. D-dimer level was always above 3,000 ng/ml. Coupling the ELISA dimer test with noninvasive explorations improves negative predictive value but can also avoid invasive explorations (venography, pulmonary angiography) in certain patients. A D-dimer test as sensitive as the ELISA test and as rapid as the latex test remains to be described.Outcomes of high pretest probability patients undergoing d-dimer testing for pulmonary embolism: a pilot study.ELISA (enzyme-linked immunosorbent assay) D-dimer testing is commonly used in the evaluation of possible pulmonary embolism (PE) in the emergency department, but is not recommended in high pretest probability patients. Whether a negative ELISA D-dimer can safely rule out PE in these patients is not known, as there have been no large studies comparing ELISA D-dimer results and outcomes in high pretest probability patients. This was a prospective observational pilot study of emergency department patients evaluated for PE. Patients evaluated for PE had pretest probability assessed by the Wells PE Score. High pretest probability was defined as: dichotomized Wells Score>4 points and patients with trichotomized Wells Score>6 points. Patients had an ELISA D-dimer ordered by the treating physician. Pulmonary embolism was defined as: positive computed tomography scan, high probability ventilation/perfusion scan, positive pulmonary angiogram, or PE on 3-month follow-up. We calculated sensitivity, specificity, positive and negative predictive value, and likelihood ratios for the ELISA D-dimer. We prospectively enrolled 541 patients who underwent D-dimer testing for PE, of whom 130 patients had Wells Score>4 and 33 patients had Wells Score>6 (not mutually exclusive). Of subjects with Wells Score>4, 23 (18%) were diagnosed with PE and 40 (31%) had a negative D-dimer. No patient with Wells Score>4 (sensitivity 100%, 95% confidence interval [CI] 82%-100%; specificity 37%, 95% CI 28%-47%) or Wells Score>6 (sensitivity 100%, 95% CI 63%-100%; specificity 56%, 95% CI 35%-76%) who had a negative D-dimer was diagnosed with PE. The likelihood ratio for a negative D-dimer was 0 for both the Wells>4, and Wells>6 groups, however, the upper limits of the confidence interval around the post-test probability for PE were 16% and 33%, respectively, for these high probability groups. In this pilot study, the rapid ELISA D-dimer had high sensitivity and negative predictive value even when applied to patients with high pretest probability for PE. However, with the post-test probability of PE still as high as 16-33% in the negative D-dimer groups, this precludes applying the results to patient care at present. Further testing is warranted to determine whether these findings can be safely incorporated into practice.D-dimer testing for suspected pulmonary embolism in outpatients.The plasma level of D-dimer, a fibrin degradation product (FDP), is nearly always increased in the presence of acute pulmonary embolism (PE). Hence, a normal D-dimer level (below a cutoff value of 500 micrograms/L by enzyme-linked immunosorbent assay [ELISA]) may allow the exclusion of PE. To assess the negative predictive value of a D-dimer concentration below 500 micrograms/L in outpatients with suspected PE, and the safety of withholding anticoagulant treatment from such patients, we performed D-dimer assays, lower limb venous compression ultrasonography, and lung scans in 671 consecutive outpatients presenting in the Emergency Center of the Geneva University Hospital with suspected PE. Pulmonary angiography was reserved for patients with an inconclusive noninvasive workup. Patients with a normal D-dimer concentration were discharged without anticoagulant treatment and followed for 3 mo. The prevalence of PE was 29%, and D-dimer (using a cutoff of 500 micrograms/L) had a diagnostic sensitivity for PE of 99.5%. Overall diagnostic specificity of D-dimer was 41%, but it was lower among older patients. Of the 198 patients with a D-dimer concentration below the cutoff value, 196 were free of PE, one had a PE, and one had incomplete information because of loss to follow-up. Thus, the negative predictive value of D-dimer concentration fell between 197 of 198 and 196 of 198 cases of PE (99% [95% CI: 96.4 to 99.9]). Using a cutoff value of 4,000 micrograms/L, the overall specificity of D-dimer concentration for PE was 93.1%. In conclusion, a plasma D-dimer concentration below 500 micrograms/L allows the exclusion of PE in 29% of outpatients suspected of having PE. Withholding anticoagulation from such patients is associated with a conservative 1% risk of thromboembolic events during follow-up.Diagnostic value of plasma D-dimer in suspected pulmonary embolism.The use of D-dimer testing and Wells score in patients with high probability for acute pulmonary embolism.To investigate if a combination of Wells pre-test probability score and D-dimer testing could be used as a safe base for making clinical decisions on further investigations for patients with intermediate to high risks of pulmonary embolism (PE).One hundred and twenty patients with signs or symptoms of acute PE were investigated with pulmonary angiography (PA) or contrast enhanced computed tomography of the pulmonary arteries (CTPA), D-dimer testing (Tinaquant) and clinical scoring using the Wells pre-test probability score during their first 48 hours at the hospital. Patients were recruited consecutively from emergency departments at two teaching hospitals.The cut-off value of 0.5 mg L(-1) in D-dimer analysis is proved adequate with a negative predictive value (NPV) of 92% in this group of patients with intermediate to high risks. The combination of D-dimer testing and Wells score increases the NPV to 94%. The specificities of both tests were low.D-dimer and Wells pre-test probability scores are safe to rule out acute PE even in patients with at least an intermediate risk of PE, but the specificity is low. D-dimer testing had a higher NPV than Wells score and the combination improved the algorithm further. The cut-off level for a high risk of PE measured with the Wells score was four and it seems reasonable to use that cut-off level in future algorithms. In addition, both PA and CTPA can present false positive and negative results difficult to interpret.Managing suspected venous thromboembolism in a mixed primary and secondary care setting using standard clinical assessment and D-dimer in a noninvasive diagnostic strategy.Venous thromboembolism is a potentially lethal disease if not properly treated. Noninvasive strategies have become an attractive clinical option for effective diagnosis. There has been controversy, however, regarding the use of standard clinical rules in a primary care setting. The objective of the present study was to validate a noninvasive diagnostic strategy in an emergency unit giving assistance to patients with primary and secondary care needs. A total of 291 outpatients (primary and secondary care needs) with suspected venous thromboembolism attending the emergency unit of a general hospital from August 2002 to 2004 were retrospectively evaluated. The diagnostic strategy included assessment of risk for venous thromboembolism and a rapid quantitative enzyme-linked immunosorbent assay D-dimer test. Venous thromboembolism was ruled out in patients with a low-probability or intermediate-probability risk (or an unlikely diagnosis) and a negative D-dimer. The prevalence of venous thromboembolism was 8.2%. Patients with an unlikely diagnosis comprised 93.8% of the evaluations for deep venous thrombosis, and those with a low probability for pulmonary embolism comprised 81.4%. Proportions of patients with venous thromboembolic events observed were 7.2% in patients with an unlikely diagnosis of deep venous thrombosis and 3.0% in those with low probability for pulmonary embolism. The percentage of patients with a thrombotic event excluded using this strategy was 37% (positive predictive value 13%, negative predictive value 100%). In conclusion, this noninvasive clinical strategy is safe for ruling out venous thromboembolism, and excludes the need for imaging tests in about one-third of the patients in the population studied.D-dimer concentration increases with age reducing the clinical value of the D-dimer assay in the elderly.The D-dimer assay is used as an exclusion test in the assessment of suspected venous thromboembolic disease; patients with a negative result have a low probability of thrombosis. We reviewed the D-dimer results from a hospital and community laboratory using the vidas D-dimer test to assess the influence of age on the D-dimer assay.D-dimer results from 6631 unselected patients aged more than 16 years were analysed in four age groups and it was shown that the median D-dimer concentration increased with age (16-40 years, 294 ng/mL; 40-60 years, 387 ng/mL; 60-80 years; 854 ng/mL; >80 years, 1397 ng/mL). To test the effect of age on the assay specificity, a cohort of 1897 patients with suspected venous thromboembolic disease was analysed separately. Patients with a negative D-dimer were discharged without further investigation. Patients with a positive result and a clinical suspicion of thrombosis underwent further investigation. One hundred and sixty-five deep vein thrombosis or pulmonary embolus cases were identified.The assay specificity decreased with age from 70% in patients less than 40 years to below 5% in patients more than 80 years. Receiver operator curves were prepared for each age group and the effect of altering the threshold value was analysed. In patients 60-80 years old a threshold value of 1000 ng/mL increased assay specificity to 55% without loss of assay sensitivity.The vidas D-dimer assay with a threshold value of 500 ng/mL has little clinical value as an exclusion test in patients more than 80 years old. The assay specificity is poor (26%) in patients aged 60-80 years but could be improved by increasing the threshold value to 1000 ng/mL. We believe that this should be tested in a prospective trial.D-dimer and thrombin-antithrombin III complexes in patients with clinically suspected pulmonary embolism.One hundred and fifty-six consecutive patients with clinically suspected pulmonary embolism (PE) had blood drawn to measure levels of D-dimer and thrombin-antithrombin (TAT) complexes and underwent ventilation/perfusion (V/Q) lung scanning and bilateral impedance plethysmography (IPG); pulmonary angiography was performed in 10 patients. Patients were classified as: PE-positive (positive pulmonary angiography or high probability lung scan or non-high probability lung scan and abnormal IPG) or, PE-negative (normal lung scan or normal pulmonary angiography) or PE-unlikely (non-high probability lung scan and normal serial IPG and absence of venous thromboembolism in follow-up). Thirty patients were classified as PE-positive, 64 as PE-negative and 62 patients as PE-unlikely. PE-positive patients were treated with anticoagulants, whereas PE-negative and PE-unlikely patients were not. PE-unlikely patients were followed for 3 months with repeat IPG and clinical evaluation for the occurrence of venous thromboembolism. The sensitivities, specificities, positive predictive values and negative predictive values of the D-dimer and TAT complex assays were calculated for patients classified as PE-positive and PE-negative. In addition, the prevalences of normal D-dimer and TAT complex assays were calculated for PE-unlikely patients. Cutoffs of 300 ng/ml for D-dimer and 3.5 micrograms/ml for TAT complexes provided sensitivities of 96% for both assays, negative predictive values of 97% for D-dimer and 96% for TAT complexes and specificities of 52% for D-dimer and 51% for TAT complexes. The specificities of the assays were higher in patients without comorbid conditions and in outpatients.(ABSTRACT TRUNCATED AT 250 WORDS)Multicenter evaluation of a new quantitative highly sensitive D-dimer assay, the Hemosil D-dimer HS 500, in patients with clinically suspected venous thromboembolism.D-dimer testing is widely used in conjunction with clinical pretest probability (PTP) for venous thromboembolism (VTE) exclusion. We report on a multicenter evaluation of a new, automated, latex enhanced turbidimetric immunoassay [HemosIL D-Dimer HS 500, Instrumentation Laboratory (IL)].747 consecutive outpatients with suspected proximal deep vein thrombosis (DVT, n=401) or pulmonary embolism (PE, n=346) were evaluated at four university hospitals in a management study with a 3 month follow-up. Samples were tested at each center using the new D-dimer assay on an automated coagulation analyzer [ACL TOP (IL)], with clinical cut-off for VTE at 500 ng/mL (FEU).The sensitivity and negative predictive value (NPV) were 100% for all PTP subgroups (no false negative results); for both sensitivity and NPV the lower limit of the 95% CI in patients with moderate/low PTP was higher than 95%. The overall specificity was 45.1% (95%CI: 41.1-49.3%). Higher specificity value was recorded in the low PTP subgroup [49.2% (95%CI: 41.7-56.7)]. No significant differences were found between patients suspected of having DVT or PE; sensitivity and NPV were 100%. The reproducibility of the assay was good, being the total CVs% less than 10% for D-dimer concentration near the clinical cut-off.The new, highly sensitive D-dimer assay proved to be accurate when used for VTE diagnostic work-up in outpatients. Based on 100% sensitivity and NPV and lower limit of the 95% CI higher than 95%, the assay can be used as a stand-alone test in patients with non high PTP.Excluding pulmonary embolism in primary care using the Wells-rule in combination with a point-of care D-dimer test: a scenario analysis.In secondary care the Wells clinical decision rule (CDR) combined with a quantitative D-dimer test can exclude pulmonary embolism (PE) safely. The introduction of point-of-care (POC) D-dimer tests facilitates a similar diagnostic strategy in primary care.We estimated failure-rate and efficiency of a diagnostic strategy using the Wells-CDR combined with a POC-D-dimer test for excluding PE in primary care.We considered ruling out PE safe if the failure rate was <2% with a maximum upper confidence limit of 2.7%.We performed a scenario-analysis on data of 2701 outpatients suspected of PE. We used test characteristics of two qualitative POC-D-dimer tests, as derived from a meta-analysis and combined these with the Wells-CDR-score.In scenario 1 (SimpliRed-D-dimer sensitivity 85%, specificity 74%) PE was excluded safely in 23.8% of patients but only by lowering the cut-off value of the Wells rule to <2. (failure rate: 1.4%, 95% CI 0.6-2.6%)In scenario 2 (Simplify-D-dimer sensitivity 87%, specificity 62%) PE was excluded safely in 12.4% of patients provided that the Wells-cut-off value was set at 0. (failure rate: 0.9%, 95% CI 0.2-2.6%)Theoretically a diagnostic strategy using the Wells-CDR combined with a qualitative POC-D-dimer test can be used safely to exclude PE in primary care albeit with only moderate efficiency.Does a clinical decision rule using D-dimer level improve the yield of pulmonary CT angiography?The objective of our study was to evaluate the impact of incorporating a mandatory clinical decision rule and selective d-dimer use on the yield of pulmonary CT angiography (CTA).Guidelines incorporating a clinical decision rule (Wells score: range, 0-12.5) and a highly sensitive d-dimer assay as decision points were placed into a computerized order entry menu. From December 2006 through November 2008, 261 pulmonary CTA examinations of 238 men and 14 women (mean age ± SD, 65 ± 12 years; range, 31-92 years) were performed. Eight patients underwent more than one pulmonary CTA examination. Charts were reviewed. The results of pulmonary CTA, the clinical decision rule, and d-dimer level (if obtained) were analyzed with the Student t test, chi-square test, or other comparisons using statistical software (MedCalc, version 11.0).Of the pulmonary CTA examinations, 16.5% (43/261) were positive for pulmonary embolism (PE) compared with 3.1% (6/196) during the previous 2 years. The mean clinical decision rule score and mean d-dimer level were 5.5 ± 2.4 (SD) and 4956 ± 2892 ng/mL, respectively, for those with PE compared with 4.5 ± 2.1 and 2398 ± 2100 ng/mL for those without PE (both, p < 0.01). The negative predictive value of a clinical decision rule score of 4 or less and d-dimer level of less than 1000 ng/mL was 1.0. A clinical decision rule of greater than 4 and a higher d-dimer level were better predictors for PE, especially a d-dimer level of greater than 3000 ng/mL (odds ratio = 6.69; 95% CI = 2.72-16.43).Guidelines combining a clinical decision rule with d-dimer level significantly improved the utilization of pulmonary CTA and positive yield for PE.Comparison of the clinical usefulness of two quantitative D-Dimer tests in patients with a low clinical probability of pulmonary embolism.Quantitative D-Dimer tests are established methods in the non-invasive diagnostic management to rule out venous thromboembolism (VTE). The diagnostic performance and the clinical efficiency different D-Dimer assays in the exclusion of pulmonary embolism (PE) have not yet been compared in a clinical outcome study.Evaluation of the efficiency and safety of excluding the diagnosis of PE with two different quantitative D-Dimer assays in consecutive patients with clinically suspected PE.We studied the VTE-failure rate of 2206 consecutive patients with an unlikely clinical probability in whom VIDAS or Tinaquant D-Dimer tests were performed.The prevalence of PE in 1238 patients whose D-Dimer level was analyzed with Tinaquant assay was 11%. The VIDAS assay group consisted of 968 patients with a PE prevalence of 13%. The VIDAS assay had a sensitivity of 99.2% (95%CI; 96- >99.9%), the Tinaquant assay of 97.3% (95%CI; 93 -99%). The negative predictive value (NPV) in the Tinaquant assay group was 99.4% (95%CI 98-99.8%) in comparison to 99.7% (95%CI 99->99.9%) in the VIDAS assay group. During 3 month of follow-up, there were no fatal cases of PE among patients with normal D-Dimer and unlikely clinical probability in both D-Dimer assay groups. In addition, the test efficiency of Tinaquant assay was significantly higher in comparison to VIDAS assay (52% vs 42%, p<0.001).Both Tinaquant and VIDAS D-Dimer tests perform equally well in combination with an unlikely clinical probability in excluding PE. The Tinaquant test was shown to be more efficient.A comparison of three rapid D-dimer methods for the diagnosis of venous thromboembolism.We compared three rapid D-dimer methods for the diagnosis of venous thromboembolism. Patients presenting to four teaching hospitals with the possible diagnosis of deep vein thrombosis or pulmonary embolism were investigated with a combination of clinical likelihood, D-dimer (SimpliRED) and initial non-invasive testing. Patients were assigned as being positive or negative for deep vein thrombosis or pulmonary embolism based on their three-month outcome and initial test results. The three D-dimer methods compared were: (a) Accuclot D-dimer (b) IL-Test D-dimer (c) SimpliRED D-dimer. Of 993 patients, 141 had objectively confirmed deep vein thrombosis or pulmonary embolism. The sensitivity of SimpliRED, Accuclot and IL-Test were 79, 90 and 87% respectively. All three D-dimer tests gave similar negative predictive values. The SimpliRED D-dimer was found to be less sensitive than the Accuclot or IL-Test. When combined with pre-test probability all three methods are probably acceptable for use in the diagnosis of venous thromboembolism.A prospective evaluation of a quantitative D-dimer assay in the evaluation of acute pulmonary embolism.A prospective study was designed to determine if a screening quantitative serum D-dimer measurement of 1.0 microg/mL or less precludes pulmonary computed tomographic (CT) angiography in patients with possible acute pulmonary embolism (PE).Over a period of 16 months, every patient seen in the emergency department in whom there was clinical suspicion of PE sufficient to warrant pulmonary CT angiography was also requested to have a quantitative serum D-dimer level measurement taken. All pulmonary CT angiography procedures were performed on a four-slice scanner and every examination was overread by a radiologist who was blinded to the D-dimer assay results. Three-month medical record and telephone follow-up was carried out for all participants who had a serum D-dimer level of 1.0 microg/mL or less to verify no new diagnosis or death from PE.In this prospective study, 361 consecutive patients who received pulmonary CT angiography had a D-dimer level of 1.0 microg/mL or less. There were 310 patients who had negative pulmonary CT angiography results and 50 patients who had indeterminate CT angiography results. Only one patient had positive pulmonary CT angiography findings. Minimum 3-month follow-up information was available for 349 patients, none of whom reported subsequent PE, including those with indeterminate pulmonary CT angiography results.The use of a screening D-dimer measurement of 1.0 microg/mL or less precludes pulmonary CT angiography in patients with possible acute PE. The use of this quantitative D-dimer assay would decrease radiation exposure, contrast medium toxicity, cost, and time for patients seen in the emergency medicine department.Diagnosis of pulmonary embolism by a decision analysis-based strategy including clinical probability, D-dimer levels, and ultrasonography: a management study.Assessment of the clinical probability of pulmonary emboli sm, plasma D-dimer measurement, and lower-limb venous compression ultrasonography have all been advocated in the workup of suspected pulmonary embolism, to minimize the requirement for pulmonary angiography in patients with nondiagnostic lung scans. However, their contribution has not been assessed prospectively.Three hundred eight consecutive patients who came to the emergency department with suspected pulmonary embolism were managed according to a diagnostic protocol that included clinical probability assessment, lung scan, and sequential noninvasive tests: plasma D-dimer measurement by enzyme-linked immunosorbent assay (a concentration <500 microgram/L ruled out pulmonary embolism) and lower-limb B-mode venous compression ultrasonography (a positive finding was diagnostic of venous thromboembolism). Patients without pulmonary embolism according to the diagnostic workup did not receive anticoagulant treatment. The safety of this approach was assessed by a 6-month follow-up.of the 308 patients, 106 (34%) had a diagnostic lung scan (normal in 43 and high probability in 63). For the remaining 202 patients, noninvasive workup was diagnostic in 125 (62%). Pulmonary embolism was ruled out by a low clinical probability and a nondiagnostic scan in 48 patients and a D-dimer level less than 500 microgram/L in 53; pulmonary embolism was established by a high clinical probability and a nondiagnostic scan in seven patients and by a finding of a deep vein thrombosis on ultrasonography in 17. Therefore, only 77 of these 202 patients underwent pulmonary angiography (negative in 55; positive in 22). At 6-month follow-up (completed for 99.4% of the study population), only two of the 199 patients in whom the diagnostic protocol had ruled out pulmonary embolism (1.0% [95% confidence interval, 0.1 to 3.6]) had a thromboembolic event (pulmonary embolism, one; deep vein thrombosis, one).This decision analysis strategy yielded a definitive noninvasive diagnosis in 62% of patients with a nondiagnostic scan and appears to be safe.HemosIL D-dimer HS assay in the diagnosis of deep vein thrombosis and pulmonary embolism. Results of a multicenter management study.Use of the alveolar dead space fraction (Vd/Vt) and plasma D-dimers to exclude acute pulmonary embolism in ambulatory patients.To evaluate the utility of a modified calculation of the alveolar dead space fraction (Vd/Vt), combined with plasma D-dimers, to aid in the exclusion of acute pulmonary embolism (PE).A prospective comparison of screening modalities was performed in a metropolitan teaching ED. Ambulatory patients evaluated for PE underwent simultaneous end-tidal CO2 and arterial blood gas determinations, as well as venous latex-agglutination D-dimer quantification. The modified Bohr equation was used to calculate Vd/Vt as an index of alveolar dead space. Acute PE was diagnosed or excluded using appropriate combinations of clinical suspicion, ventilation-perfusion lung scanning, lower-extremity venous Doppler ultrasonography, pulmonary angiography, and comprehensive follow-up.Of 170 subjects studied, PE was confirmed (PE+) in 26 (15%) and excluded (PE-) in 144 (85%). In the PE+ group, Vd/Vt was 0.31 +/- 0.13 (mean +/- SD), and in the PE- group, Vd/Vt was 0.06 +/- 0.10 (p < 0.05, t-test). Regarding false-negative rates, Vd/Vt was normal (i.e., < 0.2) in 3/26 PE+ patients and D-dimer concentrations were normal (< 0.5 microgram/L) in 4/26 patients in the PE+ group. The combination of a normal Vd/Vt and D-dimer concentration was 100% sensitive (95% CI = 88-100%) in excluding PE. False-positive testing (either test positive) occurred in 49/144 subjects (specificity 65%, 95% CI = 52-73%). The age-adjusted alveolar-arterial O2 gradient was 33 +/- 38 torr in the PE+ group vs 13 +/- 37 torr in the PE- group (p = 0.11).In ambulatory patients, the finding of Vd/Vt < 0.2 and D-dimers < 0.5 microgram/L lowers the probability of acute PE.Measurement of D-dimer in plasma as diagnostic aid in suspected pulmonary embolism.The potential of plasma measurement of D-dimer (DD), a specific derivative of crosslinked fibrin, for diagnosis or exclusion of pulmonary embolism was investigated in a prospective series of 171 consecutive patients who attended an emergency department with suspected pulmonary embolism. The diagnosis was made or excluded by means of a clinical decision-making process which included clinical evaluation, ventilation-perfusion (VQ) lung scan, and, as indicated, pulmonary angiography, venography, or non-invasive examination of the leg veins. Pulmonary embolism was diagnosed by this process in 55 (32%) of 170 patients with sufficient data. All but 1 of these 55 patients had a DD concentration of 500 micrograms/l or above. The sensitivity and specificity of this cutoff concentration for the presence of pulmonary embolism were 98% and 39%, respectively, which give positive and negative predictive values of 44% and 98%. Among the 115 patients (68%) who had inconclusive VQ scans, 31 were diagnosed as having pulmonary embolism. 29 of the remaining 84 patients without pulmonary embolism had DD concentrations below 500 micrograms/l, which means that further diagnostic procedures could have been avoided in a quarter of the patients with inconclusive VQ scans. The sensitivity of the plasma measurement of DD remained high even 3 and 7 days after presentation (96% and 93%). Plasma measurement of DD therefore has a definite place in the diagnostic procedure for suspected acute pulmonary embolism in attenders at emergency departments: a concentration below 500 micrograms/l rules out the diagnosis.Performance of 4 clinical decision rules in the diagnostic management of acute pulmonary embolism: a prospective cohort study.Several clinical decision rules (CDRs) are available to exclude acute pulmonary embolism (PE), but they have not been directly compared.To directly compare the performance of 4 CDRs (Wells rule, revised Geneva score, simplified Wells rule, and simplified revised Geneva score) in combination with d-dimer testing to exclude PE.Prospective cohort study.7 hospitals in the Netherlands.807 consecutive patients with suspected acute PE.The clinical probability of PE was assessed by using a computer program that calculated all CDRs and indicated the next diagnostic step. Results of the CDRs and d-dimer tests guided clinical care.Results of the CDRs were compared with the prevalence of PE identified by computed tomography or venous thromboembolism at 3-month follow-up.Prevalence of PE was 23%. The proportion of patients categorized as PE-unlikely ranged from 62% (simplified Wells rule) to 72% (Wells rule). Combined with a normal d-dimer result, the CDRs excluded PE in 22% to 24% of patients. The total failure rates of the CDR and d-dimer combinations were similar (1 failure, 0.5% to 0.6% [upper-limit 95% CI, 2.9% to 3.1%]). Even though 30% of patients had discordant CDR outcomes, PE was not detected in any patient with discordant CDRs and a normal d-dimer result.Management was based on a combination of decision rules and d-dimer testing rather than only 1 CDR combined with d-dimer testing.All 4 CDRs show similar performance for exclusion of acute PE in combination with a normal d-dimer result. This prospective validation indicates that the simplified scores may be used in clinical practice.Academic Medical Center, VU University Medical Center, Rijnstate Hospital, Leiden University Medical Center, Maastricht University Medical Center, Erasmus Medical Center, and Maasstad Hospital.Validation of a new D-dimer microparticle enzyme immunoassay (AxSYM D-Dimer) in patients with suspected pulmonary embolism (PE).The aim of the study was to evaluate a new automated assay for D-dimer testing (AxSYM D-Dimer) based on microparticle enzyme-immunoassay technology by comparing it with three well established D-dimer assays.The performance of the new assay was evaluated in 280 plasma samples that were collected prospectively from out-patients included in a management study evaluating a decision based algorithm.58/280 patients (21%) had PE diagnosed by CT. Median values of AxSYM D-dimer in patients with PE were 3689 ng/mL (range 775-9000). Comparison analysis displayed excellent agreement with VIDAS (kappa=0.84) and Asserachrom (kappa=0.81) D-dimer assays. A strong correlation was found between AxSYM and the VIDAS (r=0.96) and Asserachrom (r=0.89) D-dimer assays. The highest cut-off value for AxSYM that yielded a sensitivity of 100% was 765 ng/mL with a specificity of 50%. At the cut-off level <500 ng/mL, the sensitivity and specificity of AxSYM D-dimer were 100% and 34%; VIDAS 100% and 42%; Asserachrom 100% and 40%; and STALiatest 100% and 37%, respectively. AxSYM D-dimer was negative in 75 patients (33.8%). None of these had PE at the initial work-up or VTE during the 3-month follow-up.AxSYM D-dimer seems to be safe and effective in ruling out PE in out-patients. The cut-off level can be set at 500 to 750 ng/mL, at which the assay displays a performance that is comparable to that of the ELISA based assays. However, further studies are needed to confirm the safety of the assay and to determine the most optimal cut-off level in patients with venous thromboembolism.D-dimers and efficacy of clinical risk estimation algorithms: sensitivity in evaluation of acute pulmonary embolism.The goal of this study was to test the efficacy of clinical risk algorithms and a quantitative immunoturbidimetric D-dimer assay in the evaluation of patients undergoing pulmonary CT angiography for suspected acute pulmonary embolism.From April 1, 2007, to March 31, 2008, emergency department evaluations for clinically suspected pulmonary embolism were performed with the revised Geneva score, a quantitative D-dimer assay, and pulmonary CT angiography.Evaluations for pulmonary embolism were performed for 745 consecutively registered patients, 627 of whom were included in the study. The other 118 patients were excluded because a d-dimer assay was not performed. According to the revised Geneva score, 281 patients had low clinical probability of having pulmonary embolism; 330, intermediate probability; and 16, high probability. CT angiography showed that 28 patients had pulmonary embolism (six in the low-probability group, 17 in the intermediate-probability group, and five in the high-probability group). The sensitivity, negative predictive value, and specificity of the D-dimer assay were 100%, 100%, and 25% (low-clinical-probability group); 100%, 100%, and 33% (intermediate-probability group); and 80%, 80%, and 37% (high-probability group).The data appear to support the use of a quantitative D-dimer assay as a first-line test in evaluation for pulmonary embolism when the clinical probability of the presence of pulmonary embolism is low or intermediate. The sensitivity and negative predictive value were 100% for these cases. More than 26% of CT angiographic examinations might have been avoided if the D-dimer assay had been used as a first-line test in the care of patients at low or intermediate risk. Because of the small sample size, the D-dimer assay is not recommended as a first-line test in the evaluation of patients at high risk.Excluding pulmonary embolism without imaging tests--can our diagnostic algorithm be optimized?Prospective study of the diagnostic accuracy of the simplify D-dimer assay for pulmonary embolism in emergency department patients.To determine if a d-dimer assay (Simplify D-dimer; Agen Biomedical; Brisbane, Australia) can reliably exclude pulmonary embolism (PE) by producing a posttest probability of PE < 1% in low-risk, symptomatic emergency department (ED) patients.Hemodynamically stable patients were evaluated for PE using a structured d-dimer-centered protocol; d-dimer testing was performed prior to imaging. Prior to testing, physicians completed an electronic data form that included their unstructured clinical estimate for the pretest probability of PE (< 15%, 15 to 40%, or > 40%) and the elements of the Charlotte rule and Canadian score for PE. Criterion standard was selective use of pulmonary vascular imaging and 90-day follow-up.We enrolled 2,302 patients (mean age, 45 +/- 16 years [+/- SD]; 31% male); 108 patients received a diagnosis of PE (4.7%; 95% confidence interval [CI], 3.6 to 5.6%). The overall sensitivity and specificity of the d-dimer assay were 80.6% (95% CI, 71.8 to 87.5%) and 72.5% (95% CI, 70.6 to 74.4%), respectively. The negative likelihood ratio and negative predictive value were 0.27 (95% CI, 0.18 to 0.39) and 98.7% (95% CI, 98.0 to 99.1%), respectively. The posttest prevalence of PE among low-risk patients with negative d-dimer results was 0.7% (95% CI, 0.3 to 1.4%) for the unstructured estimate, 1.2% (95% CI, 0.7 to 2.0%) for the Canadian score, and 1.1% (95% CI, 0.6 to 1.7%) for the Charlotte rule.The Simplify D-dimer assay had moderate sensitivity and relatively high specificity for PE in low-risk ED patients. The combination of a physician's unstructured estimate of pretest probability of PE of < 15% and a negative d-dimer result produced a posttest probability of PE of 0.7% (95% CI, 0.3 to 1.4%).Diagnostic management of pulmonary embolism using clinical assessment, plasma D-dimer assay, complete lower limb venous ultrasound and helical computed tomography of pulmonary arteries. A multicentre clinical outcome study.The objective of the study was to assess the clinical validity of a non-invasive diagnostic strategy for acute pulmonary embolism using clinical assessment combined with both ELISA D-dimer and complete lower limb ultrasound (US) examination of proximal and distal veins, before single-detector helical computed tomography (CT) of pulmonary arteries. We expected the strategy to have a high diagnostic exclusion power and to safely decrease the number of CT scans. This prospective, multicenter outcome study included 274 consecutive outpatients. All underwent a priori clinical probability, D-dimer and bilateral complete lower limb US assessments. Only patients with a high clinical probability and both tests negative, or positive D-dimer and negative US assessments, underwent CT. This was deemed necessary in 114 patients (42%). At baseline, venous thromboembolism (VTE) was detected in 110 patients (40%), either by US showing proximal (n=65) or distal (n=36) thrombosis, or by CT (n=9). Anticoagulant was withheld in the remaining patients with negative results in both D-dimer and US but a non-high clinical probability (n=59), or in both US and CT (n=90), or with negative US (n=6) and inadequate CT (n=9). All patients underwent a three-month clinical follow-up. VTE occurred in one patient with inadequate CT, yielding an incidence of 0.6% [95% confidence interval: 0.1-3.4]. No patient died from VTE or had major bleeding. Using clinical probability, ELISA D-dimer and complete US before helical CT is a safe strategy resulting in a substantial reduction in CT scans.[Determination of fibrinopeptide A (FpA): comparison of an enzymatic method and isotopic method with reference to ventilation-perfusion scintigraphy].Fibrinopeptide A becomes free after thrombolysis of fibrinogen in thrombo-embolic situation. In view to quantify this molecule, the authors have compared two different methodologies (enzymatic and isotopic). Isotopic scintigraphy of lung (ventilation-perfusion) served as reference in this study for pulmonary thrombosis.Safe exclusion of pulmonary embolism using the Wells rule and qualitative D-dimer testing in primary care: prospective cohort study.To validate the use of the Wells clinical decision rule combined with a point of care D-dimer test to safely exclude pulmonary embolism in primary care.Prospective cohort study.Primary care across three different regions of the Netherlands (Amsterdam, Maastricht, and Utrecht).598 adults with suspected pulmonary embolism in primary care.Doctors scored patients according to the seven variables of the Wells rule and carried out a qualitative point of care D-dimer test. All patients were referred to secondary care and diagnosed according to local protocols. Pulmonary embolism was confirmed or refuted on the basis of a composite reference standard, including spiral computed tomography and three months' follow-up.Diagnostic accuracy (sensitivity and specificity), proportion of patients at low risk (efficiency), number of missed patients with pulmonary embolism in low risk category (false negative rate), and the presence of symptomatic venous thromboembolism, based on the composite reference standard, including events during the follow-up period of three months.Pulmonary embolism was present in 73 patients (prevalence 12.2%). On the basis of a threshold Wells score of ≤ 4 and a negative qualitative D-dimer test result, 272 of 598 patients were classified as low risk (efficiency 45.5%). Four cases of pulmonary embolism were observed in these 272 patients (false negative rate 1.5%, 95% confidence interval 0.4% to 3.7%). The sensitivity and specificity of this combined diagnostic approach was 94.5% (86.6% to 98.5%) and 51.0% (46.7% to 55.4%), respectively.A Wells score of ≤ 4 combined with a negative qualitative D-dimer test result can safely and efficiently exclude pulmonary embolism in primary care.Uses of different D-dimer levels can reduce the need for venous duplex scanning to rule out deep vein thrombosis in patients with symptomatic pulmonary embolism.This study investigated the prevalence and distribution of deep vein thrombosis (DVT) in patients with symptomatic pulmonary embolism (PE) to establish a screening protocol to reduce unnecessary venous duplex scanning using different D-dimer level rather than single cutoff point of 0.5 microg/mL in patients with low and moderate pretest clinical probability (PTP).The PTP score and D-dimer testing were used to evaluate 85 consecutive patients with symptomatically proven PE before venous duplex scanning. After calculating the PTP score, patients were divided into low (<or=0 points), moderate (1 to 2 points), and high (>or=3 points) PTP groups. The receiver operating characteristic (ROC) curves analysis was used to determine the appropriate D-dimer cutoff point in low and moderate PTP, with a negative predictive value of >98%.The study enrolled 81 patients. The prevalence of DVT was 63%, with 27 patients (33%) classified as low, 38 (47%) as moderate, and 16 (20%) as high PTP. DVT was detected in nine patients (33%) in the low PTP group, in 27 (71%) in the moderate group, and in 15 (94%) in the high group. In the low PTP patients, the difference in the value of D-dimer assay between positive-scan and negative-scan patients was statistically significant (9.99 +/- 7.33 vs 3.46 +/- 4.20, respectively; P = .008). Conversely, no significant difference in the D-dimer assay value between positive and negative scan results was found in the moderate PTP patients. ROC curves analysis were used to select D-dimer cutoff points of 2.0 microg/mL for the low PTP group and 0.7 microg/mL for the moderate PTP groups. For both groups, D-dimer testing provided 100% sensitivity and 100% negative predictive value in the diagnosis of DVT. In the low PTP group, specificity increased from 33% to 67% (P = .046). In the moderate PTP group, however, the determined D-dimer level did not improve the specificity. Overall, venous duplex scanning could have been reduced by 17% (14/81) by using different D-dimer cutoff points.A combination of specific D-dimer level and clinical probability score is most effective in the low PTP patients in excluding DVT. In the moderate PTP group, however, the recommended cutoff point of 0.5 microg/mL may be preferable. These results show that a different D-dimer level is more useful than single cutoff point of 0.5 microg/mL in excluding DVT in established PE patients.[Prognostic value of D-dimers in venous thromboembolic pathology].Diagnostic strategy using a modified clinical decision rule and D-dimer test to rule out pulmonary embolism in elderly in- and outpatients.Excluding or confirming pulmonary embolism remains a diagnostic challenge. In elderly patients pulmonary embolism is associated with substantial co-morbidity and mortality, and many elderly patients with suspected pulmonary embolism are inpatients. The safety and efficacy of the combination of a clinical probability (CDR) and d-dimer test in excluding pulmonary embolism in this group is unclear. We retrospectively analysed data of two prospective studies of consecutive in-and outpatients with suspected pulmonary embolism. The patients were categorized into three age groups: <65 years, 65-75 years and >75 years. The sensitivity, negative predictive value and the proportion of patients with the combination of a non-high CDR score according to Wells (< or = 4) and a normal d-dimer result were calculated for each group. In 747 consecutive patients with suspected pulmonary embolism, sensitivity and negative predictive value of a non-high CDR and a normal d-dimer result in outpatients (n=538) of all age categories (<65 years, 65-75 years and >75 years) were both 100%. These tests were, however, less reliable for inpatients(n=209), irrespective of their age (sensitivity 91% [ CI: 79-98%], negative predictive value 88 % [CI: 74-96%]. The proportion of both in-and outpatients >75 years with a non-high CDR and a normal d-dimer concentration was only 14%, whereas this was 22% in patients 65-75 years and 41% among in-and outpatients <65 years, respectively. In elderly outpatients the combination of a non-high CDR and a normal d-dimer result is a safe strategy to rule out pulmonary embolism. However, in inpatients this algorithm is not reliable to safely exclude pulmonary embolism. In addition, the proportion of patients >65 years in which this strategy excludes pulmonary embolism is markedly lower compared to younger patients.Simple and safe exclusion of pulmonary embolism in outpatients using quantitative D-dimer and Wells' simplified decision rule.A safe and effective management strategy is pivotal in excluding pulmonary embolism (PE). The combination of Wells' simplified dichotomous clinical decision rule and D-dimer test is non-invasive and could be highly efficient, though its safety has not been widely studied. We evaluated safety and efficiency of this combination in excluding PE. Wells clinical decision rule was performed in 941 consecutive patients with suspected PE and, if patients had a score <or=4.0 points, a VIDAS D-dimer test followed. Patients with a normal D-dimer concentration had no further tests, PE was considered excluded, and patients did not receive anticoagulant treatment. Patients, in whom PE was excluded, were followed up for three months. Four hundred fifty patients (51.2%) had a clinical decision score =4.0 points and a normal D-dimer concentration. In 45 of these patients, during the initial diagnostic period additional objective testing, although not indicated, was performed, and PE was established in two patients. During three months of follow up no venous thromboembolic events (VTE) occurred. Therefore, the overall VTE failure rate was two of 450 (0.4% [95%CI 0-1.1]); the overall prevalence of PE was 12.3%. The diagnostic protocol could be completed and allowed a decision to be made in 90% of the study patients. This study has prospectively established the safety of a combination of a dichotomized clinical decision rule and D-dimer test in ruling out PE. The strategy proved highly efficient, since more than 50% of patients could be managed without the need for more invasive and expensive tests.The performance of STA-Liatest D-dimer assay in out-patients with suspected pulmonary embolism.Several studies have shown that D-dimer can reliably rule out pulmonary embolism (PE) in out-patients. However, various assays have different sensitivities and specificities to detect thrombosis. Our aim was to evaluate the performance of STA-Liatest D-Di in out-patients referred for suspected PE in a prospective outcome study. 495 consecutive patients referred to Østfold Hospital Trust-Fredrikstad, Norway for suspected PE between February 2002 and December 2003, were recruited in a study evaluating a decision-based algorithm combining clinical probability (CP), D-dimer, and multi-slice computer tomography (MSCT). D-dimer was performed as a first step test. No further testing was carried out in patients with D-dimer < or =0.4 mg/l and low/intermediate CP. The remaining patients proceeded to MSCT. All patients were followed up for 3 months to assess the 3-month thromboembolic risk. The final cohort consisted of 432 patients. PE was diagnosed in 102 (23%) patients. At a D-dimer cut-off point of 0.4 mg/l the tests had the highest sensitivity (100%) and specificity (36%). It safely ruled out PE in 120 (28%) patients. Kappa-coefficients for comparisons versus VIDAS and Asserachrom showed good concordance. STA-Liatest is a reliable and effective assay that can safely rule out PE in out-patients with a performance comparable with that of enzyme-linked immunosorbent assay-based d-dimer levels.Diagnostic value of D-dimer in patients with suspected pulmonary embolism: results from a multicentre outcome study.D-dimer tests are used in various diagnostic strategies to exclude pulmonary embolism (PE). However, their role as an exclusionary first-line test is still uncertain, mainly because accuracy of the test varies according to the assay and the studied population.The aim of this multicentre study was to evaluate the accuracy of D-dimer testing in patients with suspected PE. Diagnosis of PE was based on pre-test clinical probability (PCP) evaluation and both single-detector spiral CT (CT) and lower limbs compression ultrasonography (CUS). Lung scanning and/or pulmonary angiography was mandatory when CT or CUS was inconclusive and when both CT and CUS were normal in a patient with a high PCP. All patients were followed-up for 3 months, looking for VTE recurrence. D-dimers were collected within 24 h of inclusion and stored in each local hematology unit, to be analyzed at the end of all inclusions; physicians in charge of the patient were blinded to D-dimer results.Three hundred and fifty two patients were included in 4 centres. Prevalence of PE was 38.6%. PCP was low in 82 (23.3%), intermediate in 176 (50%) and high in 94 (26.7%) patients. Sensitivity of D-dimer was 96.3% (95% CI: 93-99) and negative predictive value reached 94.4% (95% CI: 90-99). Five patients with a confirmed PE had a D-dimer level below 500 ng/ml (two patients with a high PCP). Among 258 patients with low or intermediate PCP, 80 (31%) had a negative D-dimer test result; three of them had a false negative result and the number needed to test was 3.3. Among 94 patients with a high PCP, 9 had a negative D-dimer test result; two of them had a false negative result and the number needed to test was 13.5.These results confirm that rapid assays used in this study can safely exclude PE in first-line testing only in non-high CP patients.Comparison of high specificity with standard versions of a quantitative latex D-dimer test in the assessment of community pulmonary embolism: HaemosIL D-dimer HS and pulmonary embolism.D-dimer assays are sensitive but have poor specificity. False positive results lead to extra imaging and hospital admissions.To make a pilot comparison of the diagnostic accuracy of the standard quantitative latex HemosIL D-dimer assay with a newer HemosIL D-dimer HS version designed to have improved specificity. PATIENTS / METHODS: Consecutive patients presenting from the community to an Emergency Department that were investigated for suspected pulmonary embolism using a D-dimer test were included in the study. Standard and D-dimer HS tests were performed. Pulmonary Embolism was diagnosed on the basis of imaging studies or post-mortem at any time from presentation to 90 days thereafter.The prevalence of Pulmonary Embolism was 4.5% (18/402). The sensitivity, specificity, negative predictive value, and positive predictive value for the standard quantitative D-dimer test was 100% (81.5 - 100.0), 49.2% (44.1 - 54.3),100% (98.1 - 100.0), and 8.5% (5.1 - 13.0), respectively, and 100% (81.5 - 100.0), 58.3% (53.2 - 63.3),100% (98.4 - 100.0), and 10.1% (6.1 - 15.5), for the D-dimer HS test. There were 35 (16%) fewer 'false positives' using the D-dimer HS assay compared with the standard assay.D-dimer HS has superior specificity to the standard quantitative D-dimer test without any loss of sensitivity. The generation of fewer false positive results should lead to less unnecessary diagnostic imaging; the use of which is associated with increased hospital admissions and length of stay. The HS assay may therefore have significant health economic benefits.Quantitative d-dimer levels and the extent of venous thromboembolism in CT angiography and lower limb ultrasonography.We evaluated the diagnostic yield of multidetector-row CT angiography and determined the clot burden within pulmonary vasculature as a measure of pulmonary embolism (PE) severity at different d-dimer levels and pretest clinical probabilities.254 consecutive patients referred to CT pulmonary angiography for suspected PE after d-dimer testing were grouped into clinical probability classes using Wells' score, and the frequency of PE was determined. A score representing clot burden within pulmonary vasculature was calculated from the number of obstructed segmental arteries in CT scans in a partly differing group of 96 PE positive patients.The prevalence of PE increases with the d-dimer level (7% at d-dimer levels of 0.5-1 microg/ml, reaching 90% at d-dimer levels > 9 microg/ml; p < 0.001). D-dimer levels above 4 microg/ml are associated with a significantly higher clot burden in pulmonary arteries (median score 11 versus 5, and 53% versus 16% of patients in the subgroup with a score > 10 points; p < 0.001), and thrombus in a main pulmonary artery was detected more frequently (37% versus 9%, p = 0.003). Similar results were obtained for distal versus proximal deep venous thromboses, detected by ultrasonography of the lower limb in a separate group of 44 patients.High d-dimer levels are associated with an increased prevalence of CT radiographic findings indicating extended clinically severe PE or lower limb venous thrombosis.[Utility of D-dimer assay for diagnosing pulmonary embolism: single institute study].Pulmonary embolism (PE) presents with diverse non-specific signs and symptoms and its diagnosis mainly depends on diagnostic imaging tests which are laborious and not cost-effective, and only a small proportion of patients with suspected PE actually have the disease. The aim of this study was to analyze the utility of D-dimer test for diagnosing PE by categorizing patients into 'PE likely' and 'PE unlikely' groups using Wells score for clinical probability.One hundred forty consecutive patients with clinically suspected PE, in whom D-dimer and imaging tests were performed were enrolled. Dignosis of PE was made when the imaging tests were positive. Wells scores were retrospectively assigned and the dignostic utility of D-dimer test was analyzed.Of the 140 patients studied, D-dimer test was positive in 97 and diagnostic imaging tests revealed PE, deep vein thrombosis (DVT), and PE+DVT in 24, 3, and 7 patients, respectively. For the diagnosis of PE, D-dimer test with cutoff value of > or =230 ng/mL showed sensitivity, specificity, and negative predictive value of 96.8%, 39.6%, and 97.7%, respectively. These values were 96.3%, 37.9%, and 91.7% in 'PE likely' group (n=56), and 100%, 38.8%, and 100% in 'PE unlikely' group (n=84). Among 43 patients with D-dimer values of <230 ng/mL, only one patient was diagnosed with PE, who belonged to the 'PE likely' group.D-dimer test cannot be used as a stand-alone test to diagnose PE, but it can be helpful for exclusion of PE especially in 'PE unlikely' group according to Wells score.Contribution of a new, rapid, individual and quantitative automated D-dimer ELISA to exclude pulmonary embolism.The performance of a new automated ELISA for a rapid, individual and quantitative measurement of plasma D-dimer (VIDAS D-dimer) has been evaluated. First, a study of 100 patients was performed in order to choose the best couple of antibodies in comparison with an already clinically validated ELISA. Then the results were certified in a prospective study including 195 consecutive patients suspected of pulmonary embolism (PE). For a cut-off level of 500 ng/ml VIDAS D-dimer showed a sensitivity of 100% (95% confidence interval 92-100), a specificity of 37.6%, a negative predictive value of 100% (95% CI 93.3-100) and a positive predictive value of 33.1%. During a 6 months' follow-up no patient (95% CI 0-6.4) with D-dimer < 500 ng/ml presented a new suspicion of venous thromboembolic disease. These results suggest that this rapid and single-dose ELISA provides a very useful tool for the clinician to exclude on a day-to-day basis the diagnosis of PE.Value of D-dimer testing for the exclusion of pulmonary embolism in patients with previous venous thromboembolism.D-dimer levels remain elevated in many patients after completion of a 6-month anticoagulant drug course for a first episode of venous thromboembolism (VTE), which may limit the clinical usefulness of D-dimer testing for ruling out a possible recurrence.We assessed the safety and usefulness of D-dimer testing in patients with suspected pulmonary embolism (PE) who had experienced a previous VTE. We analyzed data from 2 outcome studies that enrolled 1721 consecutive emergency department patients with clinically suspected PE. Information on the existence of a previous episode of VTE was abstracted from the database. All the patients underwent a sequential diagnostic workup, including an enzyme-linked immunosorbent assay D-dimer test and a 3-month follow-up.The proportion of confirmed PE was 24.1% (415/1719); PE was ruled out by a negative D-dimer test result in 32.7% (462/1411) of the patients without previous VTE but in only 15.9% (49/308) of the patients with previous VTE (P<.001). The 3-month thromboembolic risk was 0% (95% confidence interval, 0.0%-7.9%) in patients with previous VTE and a negative D-dimer test result. The 2-fold lower chance of a negative D-dimer test result in patients with previous VTE was independent of older age, active malignancy, fever, and recent surgery.In patients with suspected PE and previous VTE, a negative D-dimer test result seems to allow safely ruling out a recurrent event. However, the proportion of negative results is lower in such patients, definitely reducing the clinical usefulness of the D-dimer test in that subgroup.Performance of the AxSYM D-dimer assay for the exclusion of pulmonary embolism.Clinical usefulness of D-dimer depending on clinical probability and cutoff value in outpatients with suspected pulmonary embolism.We evaluated whether a highly sensitive D-dimer test is clinically useful and safe for ruling out pulmonary embolism (PE) in patients with a high clinical probability and whether adopting different cutoff values according to the clinical probability category might increase the proportion of patients in whom PE is ruled out.We retrospectively analyzed the databases of 2 outcome studies on the diagnosis of PE with a 3-month follow-up that included 1409 patients. We evaluated the usefulness of D-dimer testing by calculating the number needed to test to rule out one PE, and its safety by measuring the 3-month thromboembolic risk in patients not treated by anticoagulant agents based on a normal D-dimer level.The sensitivity of D-dimer was 100% in all clinical probability categories, but the number needed to test increased with increasing clinical probability of PE. The 95% confidence interval (0%-23%) of the 3-month thromboembolic risk (0%) among 13 of 121 patients with a normal D-dimer level and a high clinical probability of PE was wide. Increasing the cutoff value to 700 mug/L in patients with a low clinical probability would rule out PE in an additional 5% of the entire patient cohort at the expense of a lower sensitivity (93% [95% confidence interval, 83%-97%]).The safety of D-dimer testing in patients with a high clinical probability of PE is not established, and testing results are rarely negative in such patients. Increasing the enzyme-linked immunosorbent assay D-dimer cutoff value only marginally increased the test's usefulness.[Usefulness of fast ELISA determination of D-dimer levels for diagnosing pulmonary embolism in an emergency room].To determine the sensitivity and negative predictive value of D-dimer levels measured by fast enzyme-linked immunoabsorbent assay (ELISA) in pulmonary embolism.Prospective study of consecutive patients with suspicion of pulmonary embolism attended in the Emergency Room of the Hospital de La Princesa in Madrid, Spain. Thromboembolism was diagnosed with an algorithm established in the hospital, and D-dimer levels were determined by fast ELISA (VIDAS D-dimer Assay) in each patient suspected of pulmonary embolism. Patients with negative findings from a test not considered a reference method for thromboembolism were followed for 3 months.Of 132 patients with clinical suspicion, 28 (21.2%) were positive and 104 (78.7%) were negative for embolism. D-dimer levels were below 0.5 microg/mL in 31 patients, 30 of whom did not have pulmonary thromboembolism whereas 1 did. D-dimer levels were abowe 0..5 microg/mL in 101 patients; thromboembolism did not occur in 74 of these but was reported in the remaining 27. For a value of 1 microg/mL, 66 patients had values below the cut off, 3 of whom presented pulmonary embolism. The remaining 66 patients had D-dimer levels above or equal to 1 microg/mL; 25 of them had a positive diagnosis for embolism and 41 had a negative diagnosis. Sensitivity and negative predictive values were 96.4% (95% confidence interval [CI], 79.8%-99.9%) and 96.8% (95% CI, 81.5%-98.8%), respectively, at a cut off of 0.5 microg/mL; and 89.2% (95% CI, 70.6%-97.2%) and 95.45% (95% CI, 86.4%-98.8%), respectively, at a cut off of 1 microg/mL.In an emergency room, thromboembolism can be excluded if plasma levels of D-dimer measured by fast ELISA are below 0.5 microg/mL because of the high negative predictive value at this cut off.[Evaluation of a latex test for determining the fibrinogen/fibrin D-dimer (XDP)].In this study an agglutination assay, by a monoclonal antibody coated latex particles, has been used for measuring specifically D-dimer fibrinogen/fibrin concentrations in twenty patients with various thrombotic diseases; the authors have analyzed the test reliability and the possible interferences caused by conditions of specimens collection and preparation.[Value of plasma D-dimer assays in the diagnosis of venous thromboembolism].The diagnostic usefulness of measuring plasma D-dimers using the ELISA method and the latex agglutination test has been prospectively evaluated in 117 patients hospitalized for suspicion of acute venous thrombo-embolism (AVTE): pulmonary embolism was suspected in 80 patients and the remaining 37 had a suspicion of deep vein thrombosis of the lower limbs. The diagnosis of AVTE was confirmed in 50% of the patients, all of whom underwent gold standard invasive investigation i.e. pulmonary angiography and/or contrast venography. The sensitivity, specificity, negative predictive value and positive predictive value of a D-dimers plasma concentration exceeding 500 ng/ml for the diagnosis of AVTE were respectively 98, 58, 97 and 70% when using the ELISA method, and 86, 71, 84 and 75% when using the latex assay. In 47 patients whose lung scans yielded abnormalities of indeterminate probability of pulmonary embolism, the sensitivity of the ELISA method was very high (94%), but that of latex assay was low (67%). Our results demonstrate that measuring the plasma D-dimers by the latex assay should not be used in the diagnosis of AVTE. On the other hand, the ELISA method might be of great interest in the diagnostic strategy of AVTE, as a normal concentration of D-dimers rules out almost definitely the diagnosis of AVTE, and hence, spares from performing invasive investigations.The emergency department utility of Simplify D-dimer to exclude pulmonary embolism in patients with pleuritic chest pain.Pleuritic chest pain is a common presenting complaint in the emergency department (ED) and a symptom of pulmonary embolism. Patients with pleuritic chest pain would benefit from a simple and rapid way of screening for pulmonary embolism. The aim of this study is to assess the utility of Simplify D-dimer as a rule-out tool for pulmonary embolism in ED patients with pleuritic chest pain.This was a prospective diagnostic study in a large city-center ED. Four hundred twenty-five patients with pleuritic chest pain were prospectively recruited between February 2002 and June 2003. Simplify D-dimer testing was performed on each patient in the ED. All patients followed an independent reference standard diagnostic algorithm for pulmonary embolism. Each patient was followed up clinically for 3 months.The calculated sensitivity of Simplify D-dimer for pulmonary embolism was 81.8% (95% confidence interval [CI] 61.4% to 92.7%), and specificity was 74.2% (95% CI 69.6% to 78.4%). The negative predictive value was 98.6% (95% CI 96.6% to 99.6%), positive predictive value 15.0% (95% CI 9.1% to 22.7%), negative likelihood ratio 0.25 (95% CI 0.10 to 0.52) and positive likelihood ratio 3.17 (95% CI 2.30 to 3.97). The study cohort pretest probability was 5.3%. A negative Simplify result reduced the posttest probability to 1.3% (95% CI 0.5% to 3.4%).The Simplify D-dimer is not sufficiently sensitive to exclude the diagnosis of pulmonary embolism in all patients presenting to the ED with pleuritic chest pain.Prospective diagnostic accuracy assessment of the HemosIL HS D-dimer to exclude pulmonary embolism in emergency department patients.Chest pain and shortness of breath are among the most common symptoms requiring immediate evaluation. Testing for pulmonary embolism (PE) has become easier and widespread due to D-dimer blood tests. Safe use of these tests is only possible if sensitivity is high and they are used in non-high probability patients. We evaluated diagnostic performance of the HemosIL HS D-dimer, which despite FDA approval in 2005, has been minimally reported in prospective standard clinical care.We used a prospective observational study design to follow patients in a single center with the HemosIL HS ordered for symptoms of possible PE with positive test result if >243 ng/ml. The outcome was PE or deep venous thrombosis (DVT) at the time of presentation or subsequent 45 days determined by structured evaluation of imaging tests, phone, or medical record follow-up in all patients.529 patients received a D-dimer and 4.7% were ultimately diagnosed with PE or DVT. The sensitivity of the HemosIL HS was 96.0% (95% CI; 79.6 to 99.9%) specificity was 65.7% (95% CI; 61.4 to 69.8%) and likelihood ratio negative was 0.06 (95% CI; 0.01 to 0.42). The probability of PE in patients with a negative D-dimer was 1/332 or 0.3% (95% CI; 0.01% to 1.67%). The receiver operator curve had an area under the curve of 0.87 and supported the current cut-point as optimal.The HemosIL HS D-dimer had high sensitivity, very low negative post-test probability and is useful in excluding PE in the acute care setting.[Diagnosis of venous thrombosis and/or pulmonary embolism by determination of d-dimers using ELISA. Review based on a study of 80 consecutive patients hospitalized in an emergency unit].The sensitivity and specificity of an ELISA method (Fibrinostika Fbdp Organon Teknika) for assay of D-dimers in the diagnosis of deep vein thrombosis and/or pulmonary embolism was studied in 80 consecutive patients seen at an emergency unit. Fifty-six of the patients presented clinical signs of deep vein thrombosis. Diagnosis was confirmed in 26 of the 56 patients with a D-dimer level above 370 ng/ml (sensitivity 92.3%) and 370 ng/ml for 13 of 30 patients with a negative venous ultrasound Doppler examination (specificity 43.3%). The positive predictive value was 58.5% and the negative predictive value was 87%. There was a significant difference in the level of D-dimers between distal and proximal deep vein thrombosis. In 40 cases with suspected pulmonary embolis, either alone or with suspected deep vein thrombosis, diagnosis was made in only 4 of 9 with a highly or intermediately probable ventilation/perfusion scan. D-dimer level was always above 3,000 ng/ml. Coupling the ELISA dimer test with noninvasive explorations improves negative predictive value but can also avoid invasive explorations (venography, pulmonary angiography) in certain patients. A D-dimer test as sensitive as the ELISA test and as rapid as the latex test remains to be described.Outcomes of high pretest probability patients undergoing d-dimer testing for pulmonary embolism: a pilot study.ELISA (enzyme-linked immunosorbent assay) D-dimer testing is commonly used in the evaluation of possible pulmonary embolism (PE) in the emergency department, but is not recommended in high pretest probability patients. Whether a negative ELISA D-dimer can safely rule out PE in these patients is not known, as there have been no large studies comparing ELISA D-dimer results and outcomes in high pretest probability patients. This was a prospective observational pilot study of emergency department patients evaluated for PE. Patients evaluated for PE had pretest probability assessed by the Wells PE Score. High pretest probability was defined as: dichotomized Wells Score>4 points and patients with trichotomized Wells Score>6 points. Patients had an ELISA D-dimer ordered by the treating physician. Pulmonary embolism was defined as: positive computed tomography scan, high probability ventilation/perfusion scan, positive pulmonary angiogram, or PE on 3-month follow-up. We calculated sensitivity, specificity, positive and negative predictive value, and likelihood ratios for the ELISA D-dimer. We prospectively enrolled 541 patients who underwent D-dimer testing for PE, of whom 130 patients had Wells Score>4 and 33 patients had Wells Score>6 (not mutually exclusive). Of subjects with Wells Score>4, 23 (18%) were diagnosed with PE and 40 (31%) had a negative D-dimer. No patient with Wells Score>4 (sensitivity 100%, 95% confidence interval [CI] 82%-100%; specificity 37%, 95% CI 28%-47%) or Wells Score>6 (sensitivity 100%, 95% CI 63%-100%; specificity 56%, 95% CI 35%-76%) who had a negative D-dimer was diagnosed with PE. The likelihood ratio for a negative D-dimer was 0 for both the Wells>4, and Wells>6 groups, however, the upper limits of the confidence interval around the post-test probability for PE were 16% and 33%, respectively, for these high probability groups. In this pilot study, the rapid ELISA D-dimer had high sensitivity and negative predictive value even when applied to patients with high pretest probability for PE. However, with the post-test probability of PE still as high as 16-33% in the negative D-dimer groups, this precludes applying the results to patient care at present. Further testing is warranted to determine whether these findings can be safely incorporated into practice.D-dimer testing for suspected pulmonary embolism in outpatients.The plasma level of D-dimer, a fibrin degradation product (FDP), is nearly always increased in the presence of acute pulmonary embolism (PE). Hence, a normal D-dimer level (below a cutoff value of 500 micrograms/L by enzyme-linked immunosorbent assay [ELISA]) may allow the exclusion of PE. To assess the negative predictive value of a D-dimer concentration below 500 micrograms/L in outpatients with suspected PE, and the safety of withholding anticoagulant treatment from such patients, we performed D-dimer assays, lower limb venous compression ultrasonography, and lung scans in 671 consecutive outpatients presenting in the Emergency Center of the Geneva University Hospital with suspected PE. Pulmonary angiography was reserved for patients with an inconclusive noninvasive workup. Patients with a normal D-dimer concentration were discharged without anticoagulant treatment and followed for 3 mo. The prevalence of PE was 29%, and D-dimer (using a cutoff of 500 micrograms/L) had a diagnostic sensitivity for PE of 99.5%. Overall diagnostic specificity of D-dimer was 41%, but it was lower among older patients. Of the 198 patients with a D-dimer concentration below the cutoff value, 196 were free of PE, one had a PE, and one had incomplete information because of loss to follow-up. Thus, the negative predictive value of D-dimer concentration fell between 197 of 198 and 196 of 198 cases of PE (99% [95% CI: 96.4 to 99.9]). Using a cutoff value of 4,000 micrograms/L, the overall specificity of D-dimer concentration for PE was 93.1%. In conclusion, a plasma D-dimer concentration below 500 micrograms/L allows the exclusion of PE in 29% of outpatients suspected of having PE. Withholding anticoagulation from such patients is associated with a conservative 1% risk of thromboembolic events during follow-up.Diagnostic value of plasma D-dimer in suspected pulmonary embolism.The use of D-dimer testing and Wells score in patients with high probability for acute pulmonary embolism.To investigate if a combination of Wells pre-test probability score and D-dimer testing could be used as a safe base for making clinical decisions on further investigations for patients with intermediate to high risks of pulmonary embolism (PE).One hundred and twenty patients with signs or symptoms of acute PE were investigated with pulmonary angiography (PA) or contrast enhanced computed tomography of the pulmonary arteries (CTPA), D-dimer testing (Tinaquant) and clinical scoring using the Wells pre-test probability score during their first 48 hours at the hospital. Patients were recruited consecutively from emergency departments at two teaching hospitals.The cut-off value of 0.5 mg L(-1) in D-dimer analysis is proved adequate with a negative predictive value (NPV) of 92% in this group of patients with intermediate to high risks. The combination of D-dimer testing and Wells score increases the NPV to 94%. The specificities of both tests were low.D-dimer and Wells pre-test probability scores are safe to rule out acute PE even in patients with at least an intermediate risk of PE, but the specificity is low. D-dimer testing had a higher NPV than Wells score and the combination improved the algorithm further. The cut-off level for a high risk of PE measured with the Wells score was four and it seems reasonable to use that cut-off level in future algorithms. In addition, both PA and CTPA can present false positive and negative results difficult to interpret.Managing suspected venous thromboembolism in a mixed primary and secondary care setting using standard clinical assessment and D-dimer in a noninvasive diagnostic strategy.Venous thromboembolism is a potentially lethal disease if not properly treated. Noninvasive strategies have become an attractive clinical option for effective diagnosis. There has been controversy, however, regarding the use of standard clinical rules in a primary care setting. The objective of the present study was to validate a noninvasive diagnostic strategy in an emergency unit giving assistance to patients with primary and secondary care needs. A total of 291 outpatients (primary and secondary care needs) with suspected venous thromboembolism attending the emergency unit of a general hospital from August 2002 to 2004 were retrospectively evaluated. The diagnostic strategy included assessment of risk for venous thromboembolism and a rapid quantitative enzyme-linked immunosorbent assay D-dimer test. Venous thromboembolism was ruled out in patients with a low-probability or intermediate-probability risk (or an unlikely diagnosis) and a negative D-dimer. The prevalence of venous thromboembolism was 8.2%. Patients with an unlikely diagnosis comprised 93.8% of the evaluations for deep venous thrombosis, and those with a low probability for pulmonary embolism comprised 81.4%. Proportions of patients with venous thromboembolic events observed were 7.2% in patients with an unlikely diagnosis of deep venous thrombosis and 3.0% in those with low probability for pulmonary embolism. The percentage of patients with a thrombotic event excluded using this strategy was 37% (positive predictive value 13%, negative predictive value 100%). In conclusion, this noninvasive clinical strategy is safe for ruling out venous thromboembolism, and excludes the need for imaging tests in about one-third of the patients in the population studied.D-dimer concentration increases with age reducing the clinical value of the D-dimer assay in the elderly.The D-dimer assay is used as an exclusion test in the assessment of suspected venous thromboembolic disease; patients with a negative result have a low probability of thrombosis. We reviewed the D-dimer results from a hospital and community laboratory using the vidas D-dimer test to assess the influence of age on the D-dimer assay.D-dimer results from 6631 unselected patients aged more than 16 years were analysed in four age groups and it was shown that the median D-dimer concentration increased with age (16-40 years, 294 ng/mL; 40-60 years, 387 ng/mL; 60-80 years; 854 ng/mL; >80 years, 1397 ng/mL). To test the effect of age on the assay specificity, a cohort of 1897 patients with suspected venous thromboembolic disease was analysed separately. Patients with a negative D-dimer were discharged without further investigation. Patients with a positive result and a clinical suspicion of thrombosis underwent further investigation. One hundred and sixty-five deep vein thrombosis or pulmonary embolus cases were identified.The assay specificity decreased with age from 70% in patients less than 40 years to below 5% in patients more than 80 years. Receiver operator curves were prepared for each age group and the effect of altering the threshold value was analysed. In patients 60-80 years old a threshold value of 1000 ng/mL increased assay specificity to 55% without loss of assay sensitivity.The vidas D-dimer assay with a threshold value of 500 ng/mL has little clinical value as an exclusion test in patients more than 80 years old. The assay specificity is poor (26%) in patients aged 60-80 years but could be improved by increasing the threshold value to 1000 ng/mL. We believe that this should be tested in a prospective trial.D-dimer and thrombin-antithrombin III complexes in patients with clinically suspected pulmonary embolism.One hundred and fifty-six consecutive patients with clinically suspected pulmonary embolism (PE) had blood drawn to measure levels of D-dimer and thrombin-antithrombin (TAT) complexes and underwent ventilation/perfusion (V/Q) lung scanning and bilateral impedance plethysmography (IPG); pulmonary angiography was performed in 10 patients. Patients were classified as: PE-positive (positive pulmonary angiography or high probability lung scan or non-high probability lung scan and abnormal IPG) or, PE-negative (normal lung scan or normal pulmonary angiography) or PE-unlikely (non-high probability lung scan and normal serial IPG and absence of venous thromboembolism in follow-up). Thirty patients were classified as PE-positive, 64 as PE-negative and 62 patients as PE-unlikely. PE-positive patients were treated with anticoagulants, whereas PE-negative and PE-unlikely patients were not. PE-unlikely patients were followed for 3 months with repeat IPG and clinical evaluation for the occurrence of venous thromboembolism. The sensitivities, specificities, positive predictive values and negative predictive values of the D-dimer and TAT complex assays were calculated for patients classified as PE-positive and PE-negative. In addition, the prevalences of normal D-dimer and TAT complex assays were calculated for PE-unlikely patients. Cutoffs of 300 ng/ml for D-dimer and 3.5 micrograms/ml for TAT complexes provided sensitivities of 96% for both assays, negative predictive values of 97% for D-dimer and 96% for TAT complexes and specificities of 52% for D-dimer and 51% for TAT complexes. The specificities of the assays were higher in patients without comorbid conditions and in outpatients.(ABSTRACT TRUNCATED AT 250 WORDS)Multicenter evaluation of a new quantitative highly sensitive D-dimer assay, the Hemosil D-dimer HS 500, in patients with clinically suspected venous thromboembolism.D-dimer testing is widely used in conjunction with clinical pretest probability (PTP) for venous thromboembolism (VTE) exclusion. We report on a multicenter evaluation of a new, automated, latex enhanced turbidimetric immunoassay [HemosIL D-Dimer HS 500, Instrumentation Laboratory (IL)].747 consecutive outpatients with suspected proximal deep vein thrombosis (DVT, n=401) or pulmonary embolism (PE, n=346) were evaluated at four university hospitals in a management study with a 3 month follow-up. Samples were tested at each center using the new D-dimer assay on an automated coagulation analyzer [ACL TOP (IL)], with clinical cut-off for VTE at 500 ng/mL (FEU).The sensitivity and negative predictive value (NPV) were 100% for all PTP subgroups (no false negative results); for both sensitivity and NPV the lower limit of the 95% CI in patients with moderate/low PTP was higher than 95%. The overall specificity was 45.1% (95%CI: 41.1-49.3%). Higher specificity value was recorded in the low PTP subgroup [49.2% (95%CI: 41.7-56.7)]. No significant differences were found between patients suspected of having DVT or PE; sensitivity and NPV were 100%. The reproducibility of the assay was good, being the total CVs% less than 10% for D-dimer concentration near the clinical cut-off.The new, highly sensitive D-dimer assay proved to be accurate when used for VTE diagnostic work-up in outpatients. Based on 100% sensitivity and NPV and lower limit of the 95% CI higher than 95%, the assay can be used as a stand-alone test in patients with non high PTP.Excluding pulmonary embolism in primary care using the Wells-rule in combination with a point-of care D-dimer test: a scenario analysis.In secondary care the Wells clinical decision rule (CDR) combined with a quantitative D-dimer test can exclude pulmonary embolism (PE) safely. The introduction of point-of-care (POC) D-dimer tests facilitates a similar diagnostic strategy in primary care.We estimated failure-rate and efficiency of a diagnostic strategy using the Wells-CDR combined with a POC-D-dimer test for excluding PE in primary care.We considered ruling out PE safe if the failure rate was <2% with a maximum upper confidence limit of 2.7%.We performed a scenario-analysis on data of 2701 outpatients suspected of PE. We used test characteristics of two qualitative POC-D-dimer tests, as derived from a meta-analysis and combined these with the Wells-CDR-score.In scenario 1 (SimpliRed-D-dimer sensitivity 85%, specificity 74%) PE was excluded safely in 23.8% of patients but only by lowering the cut-off value of the Wells rule to <2. (failure rate: 1.4%, 95% CI 0.6-2.6%)In scenario 2 (Simplify-D-dimer sensitivity 87%, specificity 62%) PE was excluded safely in 12.4% of patients provided that the Wells-cut-off value was set at 0. (failure rate: 0.9%, 95% CI 0.2-2.6%)Theoretically a diagnostic strategy using the Wells-CDR combined with a qualitative POC-D-dimer test can be used safely to exclude PE in primary care albeit with only moderate efficiency.Does a clinical decision rule using D-dimer level improve the yield of pulmonary CT angiography?The objective of our study was to evaluate the impact of incorporating a mandatory clinical decision rule and selective d-dimer use on the yield of pulmonary CT angiography (CTA).Guidelines incorporating a clinical decision rule (Wells score: range, 0-12.5) and a highly sensitive d-dimer assay as decision points were placed into a computerized order entry menu. From December 2006 through November 2008, 261 pulmonary CTA examinations of 238 men and 14 women (mean age ± SD, 65 ± 12 years; range, 31-92 years) were performed. Eight patients underwent more than one pulmonary CTA examination. Charts were reviewed. The results of pulmonary CTA, the clinical decision rule, and d-dimer level (if obtained) were analyzed with the Student t test, chi-square test, or other comparisons using statistical software (MedCalc, version 11.0).Of the pulmonary CTA examinations, 16.5% (43/261) were positive for pulmonary embolism (PE) compared with 3.1% (6/196) during the previous 2 years. The mean clinical decision rule score and mean d-dimer level were 5.5 ± 2.4 (SD) and 4956 ± 2892 ng/mL, respectively, for those with PE compared with 4.5 ± 2.1 and 2398 ± 2100 ng/mL for those without PE (both, p < 0.01). The negative predictive value of a clinical decision rule score of 4 or less and d-dimer level of less than 1000 ng/mL was 1.0. A clinical decision rule of greater than 4 and a higher d-dimer level were better predictors for PE, especially a d-dimer level of greater than 3000 ng/mL (odds ratio = 6.69; 95% CI = 2.72-16.43).Guidelines combining a clinical decision rule with d-dimer level significantly improved the utilization of pulmonary CTA and positive yield for PE.Comparison of the clinical usefulness of two quantitative D-Dimer tests in patients with a low clinical probability of pulmonary embolism.Quantitative D-Dimer tests are established methods in the non-invasive diagnostic management to rule out venous thromboembolism (VTE). The diagnostic performance and the clinical efficiency different D-Dimer assays in the exclusion of pulmonary embolism (PE) have not yet been compared in a clinical outcome study.Evaluation of the efficiency and safety of excluding the diagnosis of PE with two different quantitative D-Dimer assays in consecutive patients with clinically suspected PE.We studied the VTE-failure rate of 2206 consecutive patients with an unlikely clinical probability in whom VIDAS or Tinaquant D-Dimer tests were performed.The prevalence of PE in 1238 patients whose D-Dimer level was analyzed with Tinaquant assay was 11%. The VIDAS assay group consisted of 968 patients with a PE prevalence of 13%. The VIDAS assay had a sensitivity of 99.2% (95%CI; 96- >99.9%), the Tinaquant assay of 97.3% (95%CI; 93 -99%). The negative predictive value (NPV) in the Tinaquant assay group was 99.4% (95%CI 98-99.8%) in comparison to 99.7% (95%CI 99->99.9%) in the VIDAS assay group. During 3 month of follow-up, there were no fatal cases of PE among patients with normal D-Dimer and unlikely clinical probability in both D-Dimer assay groups. In addition, the test efficiency of Tinaquant assay was significantly higher in comparison to VIDAS assay (52% vs 42%, p<0.001).Both Tinaquant and VIDAS D-Dimer tests perform equally well in combination with an unlikely clinical probability in excluding PE. The Tinaquant test was shown to be more efficient.A comparison of three rapid D-dimer methods for the diagnosis of venous thromboembolism.We compared three rapid D-dimer methods for the diagnosis of venous thromboembolism. Patients presenting to four teaching hospitals with the possible diagnosis of deep vein thrombosis or pulmonary embolism were investigated with a combination of clinical likelihood, D-dimer (SimpliRED) and initial non-invasive testing. Patients were assigned as being positive or negative for deep vein thrombosis or pulmonary embolism based on their three-month outcome and initial test results. The three D-dimer methods compared were: (a) Accuclot D-dimer (b) IL-Test D-dimer (c) SimpliRED D-dimer. Of 993 patients, 141 had objectively confirmed deep vein thrombosis or pulmonary embolism. The sensitivity of SimpliRED, Accuclot and IL-Test were 79, 90 and 87% respectively. All three D-dimer tests gave similar negative predictive values. The SimpliRED D-dimer was found to be less sensitive than the Accuclot or IL-Test. When combined with pre-test probability all three methods are probably acceptable for use in the diagnosis of venous thromboembolism.A prospective evaluation of a quantitative D-dimer assay in the evaluation of acute pulmonary embolism.A prospective study was designed to determine if a screening quantitative serum D-dimer measurement of 1.0 microg/mL or less precludes pulmonary computed tomographic (CT) angiography in patients with possible acute pulmonary embolism (PE).Over a period of 16 months, every patient seen in the emergency department in whom there was clinical suspicion of PE sufficient to warrant pulmonary CT angiography was also requested to have a quantitative serum D-dimer level measurement taken. All pulmonary CT angiography procedures were performed on a four-slice scanner and every examination was overread by a radiologist who was blinded to the D-dimer assay results. Three-month medical record and telephone follow-up was carried out for all participants who had a serum D-dimer level of 1.0 microg/mL or less to verify no new diagnosis or death from PE.In this prospective study, 361 consecutive patients who received pulmonary CT angiography had a D-dimer level of 1.0 microg/mL or less. There were 310 patients who had negative pulmonary CT angiography results and 50 patients who had indeterminate CT angiography results. Only one patient had positive pulmonary CT angiography findings. Minimum 3-month follow-up information was available for 349 patients, none of whom reported subsequent PE, including those with indeterminate pulmonary CT angiography results.The use of a screening D-dimer measurement of 1.0 microg/mL or less precludes pulmonary CT angiography in patients with possible acute PE. The use of this quantitative D-dimer assay would decrease radiation exposure, contrast medium toxicity, cost, and time for patients seen in the emergency medicine department.Diagnosis of pulmonary embolism by a decision analysis-based strategy including clinical probability, D-dimer levels, and ultrasonography: a management study.Assessment of the clinical probability of pulmonary emboli sm, plasma D-dimer measurement, and lower-limb venous compression ultrasonography have all been advocated in the workup of suspected pulmonary embolism, to minimize the requirement for pulmonary angiography in patients with nondiagnostic lung scans. However, their contribution has not been assessed prospectively.Three hundred eight consecutive patients who came to the emergency department with suspected pulmonary embolism were managed according to a diagnostic protocol that included clinical probability assessment, lung scan, and sequential noninvasive tests: plasma D-dimer measurement by enzyme-linked immunosorbent assay (a concentration <500 microgram/L ruled out pulmonary embolism) and lower-limb B-mode venous compression ultrasonography (a positive finding was diagnostic of venous thromboembolism). Patients without pulmonary embolism according to the diagnostic workup did not receive anticoagulant treatment. The safety of this approach was assessed by a 6-month follow-up.of the 308 patients, 106 (34%) had a diagnostic lung scan (normal in 43 and high probability in 63). For the remaining 202 patients, noninvasive workup was diagnostic in 125 (62%). Pulmonary embolism was ruled out by a low clinical probability and a nondiagnostic scan in 48 patients and a D-dimer level less than 500 microgram/L in 53; pulmonary embolism was established by a high clinical probability and a nondiagnostic scan in seven patients and by a finding of a deep vein thrombosis on ultrasonography in 17. Therefore, only 77 of these 202 patients underwent pulmonary angiography (negative in 55; positive in 22). At 6-month follow-up (completed for 99.4% of the study population), only two of the 199 patients in whom the diagnostic protocol had ruled out pulmonary embolism (1.0% [95% confidence interval, 0.1 to 3.6]) had a thromboembolic event (pulmonary embolism, one; deep vein thrombosis, one).This decision analysis strategy yielded a definitive noninvasive diagnosis in 62% of patients with a nondiagnostic scan and appears to be safe.HemosIL D-dimer HS assay in the diagnosis of deep vein thrombosis and pulmonary embolism. Results of a multicenter management study.Use of the alveolar dead space fraction (Vd/Vt) and plasma D-dimers to exclude acute pulmonary embolism in ambulatory patients.To evaluate the utility of a modified calculation of the alveolar dead space fraction (Vd/Vt), combined with plasma D-dimers, to aid in the exclusion of acute pulmonary embolism (PE).A prospective comparison of screening modalities was performed in a metropolitan teaching ED. Ambulatory patients evaluated for PE underwent simultaneous end-tidal CO2 and arterial blood gas determinations, as well as venous latex-agglutination D-dimer quantification. The modified Bohr equation was used to calculate Vd/Vt as an index of alveolar dead space. Acute PE was diagnosed or excluded using appropriate combinations of clinical suspicion, ventilation-perfusion lung scanning, lower-extremity venous Doppler ultrasonography, pulmonary angiography, and comprehensive follow-up.Of 170 subjects studied, PE was confirmed (PE+) in 26 (15%) and excluded (PE-) in 144 (85%). In the PE+ group, Vd/Vt was 0.31 +/- 0.13 (mean +/- SD), and in the PE- group, Vd/Vt was 0.06 +/- 0.10 (p < 0.05, t-test). Regarding false-negative rates, Vd/Vt was normal (i.e., < 0.2) in 3/26 PE+ patients and D-dimer concentrations were normal (< 0.5 microgram/L) in 4/26 patients in the PE+ group. The combination of a normal Vd/Vt and D-dimer concentration was 100% sensitive (95% CI = 88-100%) in excluding PE. False-positive testing (either test positive) occurred in 49/144 subjects (specificity 65%, 95% CI = 52-73%). The age-adjusted alveolar-arterial O2 gradient was 33 +/- 38 torr in the PE+ group vs 13 +/- 37 torr in the PE- group (p = 0.11).In ambulatory patients, the finding of Vd/Vt < 0.2 and D-dimers < 0.5 microgram/L lowers the probability of acute PE.Measurement of D-dimer in plasma as diagnostic aid in suspected pulmonary embolism.The potential of plasma measurement of D-dimer (DD), a specific derivative of crosslinked fibrin, for diagnosis or exclusion of pulmonary embolism was investigated in a prospective series of 171 consecutive patients who attended an emergency department with suspected pulmonary embolism. The diagnosis was made or excluded by means of a clinical decision-making process which included clinical evaluation, ventilation-perfusion (VQ) lung scan, and, as indicated, pulmonary angiography, venography, or non-invasive examination of the leg veins. Pulmonary embolism was diagnosed by this process in 55 (32%) of 170 patients with sufficient data. All but 1 of these 55 patients had a DD concentration of 500 micrograms/l or above. The sensitivity and specificity of this cutoff concentration for the presence of pulmonary embolism were 98% and 39%, respectively, which give positive and negative predictive values of 44% and 98%. Among the 115 patients (68%) who had inconclusive VQ scans, 31 were diagnosed as having pulmonary embolism. 29 of the remaining 84 patients without pulmonary embolism had DD concentrations below 500 micrograms/l, which means that further diagnostic procedures could have been avoided in a quarter of the patients with inconclusive VQ scans. The sensitivity of the plasma measurement of DD remained high even 3 and 7 days after presentation (96% and 93%). Plasma measurement of DD therefore has a definite place in the diagnostic procedure for suspected acute pulmonary embolism in attenders at emergency departments: a concentration below 500 micrograms/l rules out the diagnosis.Performance of 4 clinical decision rules in the diagnostic management of acute pulmonary embolism: a prospective cohort study.Several clinical decision rules (CDRs) are available to exclude acute pulmonary embolism (PE), but they have not been directly compared.To directly compare the performance of 4 CDRs (Wells rule, revised Geneva score, simplified Wells rule, and simplified revised Geneva score) in combination with d-dimer testing to exclude PE.Prospective cohort study.7 hospitals in the Netherlands.807 consecutive patients with suspected acute PE.The clinical probability of PE was assessed by using a computer program that calculated all CDRs and indicated the next diagnostic step. Results of the CDRs and d-dimer tests guided clinical care.Results of the CDRs were compared with the prevalence of PE identified by computed tomography or venous thromboembolism at 3-month follow-up.Prevalence of PE was 23%. The proportion of patients categorized as PE-unlikely ranged from 62% (simplified Wells rule) to 72% (Wells rule). Combined with a normal d-dimer result, the CDRs excluded PE in 22% to 24% of patients. The total failure rates of the CDR and d-dimer combinations were similar (1 failure, 0.5% to 0.6% [upper-limit 95% CI, 2.9% to 3.1%]). Even though 30% of patients had discordant CDR outcomes, PE was not detected in any patient with discordant CDRs and a normal d-dimer result.Management was based on a combination of decision rules and d-dimer testing rather than only 1 CDR combined with d-dimer testing.All 4 CDRs show similar performance for exclusion of acute PE in combination with a normal d-dimer result. This prospective validation indicates that the simplified scores may be used in clinical practice.Academic Medical Center, VU University Medical Center, Rijnstate Hospital, Leiden University Medical Center, Maastricht University Medical Center, Erasmus Medical Center, and Maasstad Hospital.Validation of a new D-dimer microparticle enzyme immunoassay (AxSYM D-Dimer) in patients with suspected pulmonary embolism (PE).The aim of the study was to evaluate a new automated assay for D-dimer testing (AxSYM D-Dimer) based on microparticle enzyme-immunoassay technology by comparing it with three well established D-dimer assays.The performance of the new assay was evaluated in 280 plasma samples that were collected prospectively from out-patients included in a management study evaluating a decision based algorithm.58/280 patients (21%) had PE diagnosed by CT. Median values of AxSYM D-dimer in patients with PE were 3689 ng/mL (range 775-9000). Comparison analysis displayed excellent agreement with VIDAS (kappa=0.84) and Asserachrom (kappa=0.81) D-dimer assays. A strong correlation was found between AxSYM and the VIDAS (r=0.96) and Asserachrom (r=0.89) D-dimer assays. The highest cut-off value for AxSYM that yielded a sensitivity of 100% was 765 ng/mL with a specificity of 50%. At the cut-off level <500 ng/mL, the sensitivity and specificity of AxSYM D-dimer were 100% and 34%; VIDAS 100% and 42%; Asserachrom 100% and 40%; and STALiatest 100% and 37%, respectively. AxSYM D-dimer was negative in 75 patients (33.8%). None of these had PE at the initial work-up or VTE during the 3-month follow-up.AxSYM D-dimer seems to be safe and effective in ruling out PE in out-patients. The cut-off level can be set at 500 to 750 ng/mL, at which the assay displays a performance that is comparable to that of the ELISA based assays. However, further studies are needed to confirm the safety of the assay and to determine the most optimal cut-off level in patients with venous thromboembolism.D-dimers and efficacy of clinical risk estimation algorithms: sensitivity in evaluation of acute pulmonary embolism.The goal of this study was to test the efficacy of clinical risk algorithms and a quantitative immunoturbidimetric D-dimer assay in the evaluation of patients undergoing pulmonary CT angiography for suspected acute pulmonary embolism.From April 1, 2007, to March 31, 2008, emergency department evaluations for clinically suspected pulmonary embolism were performed with the revised Geneva score, a quantitative D-dimer assay, and pulmonary CT angiography.Evaluations for pulmonary embolism were performed for 745 consecutively registered patients, 627 of whom were included in the study. The other 118 patients were excluded because a d-dimer assay was not performed. According to the revised Geneva score, 281 patients had low clinical probability of having pulmonary embolism; 330, intermediate probability; and 16, high probability. CT angiography showed that 28 patients had pulmonary embolism (six in the low-probability group, 17 in the intermediate-probability group, and five in the high-probability group). The sensitivity, negative predictive value, and specificity of the D-dimer assay were 100%, 100%, and 25% (low-clinical-probability group); 100%, 100%, and 33% (intermediate-probability group); and 80%, 80%, and 37% (high-probability group).The data appear to support the use of a quantitative D-dimer assay as a first-line test in evaluation for pulmonary embolism when the clinical probability of the presence of pulmonary embolism is low or intermediate. The sensitivity and negative predictive value were 100% for these cases. More than 26% of CT angiographic examinations might have been avoided if the D-dimer assay had been used as a first-line test in the care of patients at low or intermediate risk. Because of the small sample size, the D-dimer assay is not recommended as a first-line test in the evaluation of patients at high risk.Excluding pulmonary embolism without imaging tests--can our diagnostic algorithm be optimized?Prospective study of the diagnostic accuracy of the simplify D-dimer assay for pulmonary embolism in emergency department patients.To determine if a d-dimer assay (Simplify D-dimer; Agen Biomedical; Brisbane, Australia) can reliably exclude pulmonary embolism (PE) by producing a posttest probability of PE < 1% in low-risk, symptomatic emergency department (ED) patients.Hemodynamically stable patients were evaluated for PE using a structured d-dimer-centered protocol; d-dimer testing was performed prior to imaging. Prior to testing, physicians completed an electronic data form that included their unstructured clinical estimate for the pretest probability of PE (< 15%, 15 to 40%, or > 40%) and the elements of the Charlotte rule and Canadian score for PE. Criterion standard was selective use of pulmonary vascular imaging and 90-day follow-up.We enrolled 2,302 patients (mean age, 45 +/- 16 years [+/- SD]; 31% male); 108 patients received a diagnosis of PE (4.7%; 95% confidence interval [CI], 3.6 to 5.6%). The overall sensitivity and specificity of the d-dimer assay were 80.6% (95% CI, 71.8 to 87.5%) and 72.5% (95% CI, 70.6 to 74.4%), respectively. The negative likelihood ratio and negative predictive value were 0.27 (95% CI, 0.18 to 0.39) and 98.7% (95% CI, 98.0 to 99.1%), respectively. The posttest prevalence of PE among low-risk patients with negative d-dimer results was 0.7% (95% CI, 0.3 to 1.4%) for the unstructured estimate, 1.2% (95% CI, 0.7 to 2.0%) for the Canadian score, and 1.1% (95% CI, 0.6 to 1.7%) for the Charlotte rule.The Simplify D-dimer assay had moderate sensitivity and relatively high specificity for PE in low-risk ED patients. The combination of a physician's unstructured estimate of pretest probability of PE of < 15% and a negative d-dimer result produced a posttest probability of PE of 0.7% (95% CI, 0.3 to 1.4%).Diagnostic management of pulmonary embolism using clinical assessment, plasma D-dimer assay, complete lower limb venous ultrasound and helical computed tomography of pulmonary arteries. A multicentre clinical outcome study.The objective of the study was to assess the clinical validity of a non-invasive diagnostic strategy for acute pulmonary embolism using clinical assessment combined with both ELISA D-dimer and complete lower limb ultrasound (US) examination of proximal and distal veins, before single-detector helical computed tomography (CT) of pulmonary arteries. We expected the strategy to have a high diagnostic exclusion power and to safely decrease the number of CT scans. This prospective, multicenter outcome study included 274 consecutive outpatients. All underwent a priori clinical probability, D-dimer and bilateral complete lower limb US assessments. Only patients with a high clinical probability and both tests negative, or positive D-dimer and negative US assessments, underwent CT. This was deemed necessary in 114 patients (42%). At baseline, venous thromboembolism (VTE) was detected in 110 patients (40%), either by US showing proximal (n=65) or distal (n=36) thrombosis, or by CT (n=9). Anticoagulant was withheld in the remaining patients with negative results in both D-dimer and US but a non-high clinical probability (n=59), or in both US and CT (n=90), or with negative US (n=6) and inadequate CT (n=9). All patients underwent a three-month clinical follow-up. VTE occurred in one patient with inadequate CT, yielding an incidence of 0.6% [95% confidence interval: 0.1-3.4]. No patient died from VTE or had major bleeding. Using clinical probability, ELISA D-dimer and complete US before helical CT is a safe strategy resulting in a substantial reduction in CT scans.[Determination of fibrinopeptide A (FpA): comparison of an enzymatic method and isotopic method with reference to ventilation-perfusion scintigraphy].Fibrinopeptide A becomes free after thrombolysis of fibrinogen in thrombo-embolic situation. In view to quantify this molecule, the authors have compared two different methodologies (enzymatic and isotopic). Isotopic scintigraphy of lung (ventilation-perfusion) served as reference in this study for pulmonary thrombosis.Safe exclusion of pulmonary embolism using the Wells rule and qualitative D-dimer testing in primary care: prospective cohort study.To validate the use of the Wells clinical decision rule combined with a point of care D-dimer test to safely exclude pulmonary embolism in primary care.Prospective cohort study.Primary care across three different regions of the Netherlands (Amsterdam, Maastricht, and Utrecht).598 adults with suspected pulmonary embolism in primary care.Doctors scored patients according to the seven variables of the Wells rule and carried out a qualitative point of care D-dimer test. All patients were referred to secondary care and diagnosed according to local protocols. Pulmonary embolism was confirmed or refuted on the basis of a composite reference standard, including spiral computed tomography and three months' follow-up.Diagnostic accuracy (sensitivity and specificity), proportion of patients at low risk (efficiency), number of missed patients with pulmonary embolism in low risk category (false negative rate), and the presence of symptomatic venous thromboembolism, based on the composite reference standard, including events during the follow-up period of three months.Pulmonary embolism was present in 73 patients (prevalence 12.2%). On the basis of a threshold Wells score of ≤ 4 and a negative qualitative D-dimer test result, 272 of 598 patients were classified as low risk (efficiency 45.5%). Four cases of pulmonary embolism were observed in these 272 patients (false negative rate 1.5%, 95% confidence interval 0.4% to 3.7%). The sensitivity and specificity of this combined diagnostic approach was 94.5% (86.6% to 98.5%) and 51.0% (46.7% to 55.4%), respectively.A Wells score of ≤ 4 combined with a negative qualitative D-dimer test result can safely and efficiently exclude pulmonary embolism in primary care.